

http://www.atomcentral.com/atom-bomb-history.aspx
	Max von Laue (1879-1960), of Germany, interpreted the crystalline structure of matter, clue to the secrets of atomic structure. In 1905, Albert Einstein (1879-1955) wrote the mass-energy conversion equation. Sir James Chadwick, a student and co-worker of Lord Rutherford, in 1932, discovered the third fundamental particle of the atom, the neutron. This would provide an ideal projectile for splitting the nucleus of the atom.

	The final clue to the discovery of the neutron and atomic energy was supplied to Chadwick by Frederick Joliot and his wife, Irene Curie-Joliet, who had observed a peculiar property of the radiation emitted when beryllium is bombarded with alpha particles. Enrico Fermi, an Italian physicist, in 1934, bombarded uranium with slow neutrons and created new elements. Niels Bohr, Danish physicist, is chiefly responsible for the planetary conception of the atom.

	In 1938, the discovery of fission of the uranium nucleus by neutron bombardment. Leading names in this research carried out in Germany, were Dr. Otto Hahn and Dr. Fritz Strassmann.


Einstein and Fermi did some early work from 1905, Fermi in 1934 was big deal, Bohr did some work (but wonder if something up with him? his model was wrong but it's not like they knew everything then obv. Remember hearing weird things about him. Wiki page says he thought conservation of energy be abandoned at one point.)


	In 1938, the discovery of fission of the uranium nucleus by neutron bombardment. Leading names in this research carried out in Germany, were Dr. Otto Hahn and Dr. Fritz Strassmann.


uranium fission in Germany 1938



https://www.sciencehistory.org/historical-profile/otto-hahn-lise-meitner-and-fritz-strassmann
	Meitner, Hahn, and another chemist, Strassmann (1902–1980), who had worked with the partners since 1929, were deeply involved in identifying the products of neutron bombardment of uranium and their decay patterns. It was generally expected that elements close in atomic number—quite possibly elements with higher atomic numbers than uranium—would be produced.

	Nuclear Fission Announced

	In 1938 Meitner had to leave Berlin because the Nazis were closing in on all people of Jewish ancestry. She soon found a congenial setting for her research at the Nobel Institute in Stockholm. Her nephew, the physicist Otto Frisch, was located at Niels Bohr’s institute in Copenhagen. Meanwhile, Hahn and Strassmann found that they had unexpectedly produced barium, a much lighter element than uranium, and they reported this news to Meitner. She and her nephew worked out the physics calculations of the phenomenon based on Bohr’s “droplet” model of the nucleus and clearly stated that nuclear fission of uranium had occurred.

	...News of the splitting of the atom and its awesome possibilities was brought by Bohr to scientists in the United States and ultimately resulted in the Manhattan Project.


Went from Meitner, who fled Nazis to Stockholm, to nephew otto Frish in Boh'rs institute. Han and Strassman told Meitner who told Bhorh who brought news to U.S. scientists


	...Hahn, Meitner, and Strassmann were not engaged in nuclear-weapons research during World War II. At the end of the war Hahn was astonished to hear that he had won the Nobel Prize in Chemistry in 1944 and that nuclear bombs had been developed from his basic discovery.


why didn't they publish their research? was this top secret research or just normal Uni research?


https://physicstoday.scitation.org/doi/full/10.1063/PT.3.2817
	On the belated discovery of fission
	A remarkable sequence of missteps, misfortune, and oversights delayed the discovery of nuclear fission until the eve of World War II—and likely altered history’s course.


what's up with that

	...Two of Fermi’s collaborators, Emilio Segrè and Edoardo Amaldi, have each suggested2 that fission could have been discovered as early as 1935. Of course, with the benefit of hindsight it is easy to argue that most scientific discoveries could have been made sooner than they actually were, and a four-year delay might not be unusual. In the case of fission, however, the implications for world history are staggering. The war almost certainly would have taken a different form had fission been discovered even two years earlier. Quite possibly it would have gone nuclear earlier, although the fear of nuclear weapons could conceivably have prevented war altogether—and, as a side effect, allowed the Nazi regime to survive. On the other hand, that same fear might well have accelerated the outbreak of war, with each side seeking to destroy the other’s nuclear installations with conventional arms.

	Fascinating as those speculations may be, my intention in this article is not to explore the byways of counterfactual history. I simply mention some of the possibilities to suggest that in raising the question of the timing of fission’s discovery, one raises what must be one of the great what-ifs of world history.


another "great what-if" in history

	...Why fission was unthinkable

	The primary obstacle delaying fission’s discovery was the belief that nothing heavier than alpha particles could be ejected from a nucleus under neutron bombardment.

	...The idea that actual nuclear reactions must involve more nucleons than are assumed by the direct-reaction model was pushed to its logical extreme in the compound-nucleus model,5 proposed in 1936 by Niels Bohr in Copenhagen.


goddam nihilists


https://blogs.scientificamerican.com/guest-blog/why-it-s-okay-to-teach-wrong-ideas-in-physics/
	Why It's Okay to Teach Wrong Ideas in Physics

	The story of how Niels Bohr got the structure of the atom wrong, and how that was corrected, tells us a lot about how science works

	    By Sam Anderson on May 31, 2016



https://physicstoday.scitation.org/doi/full/10.1063/PT.3.2817
	...Had they examined the collective modes of a liquid drop, they might well have been able to predict fission. Given that Bohr’s very first paper was devoted to the dynamical properties of real liquid drops, one might find the omission surprising. 


what


	...While writing the paper with his aunt, Frisch briefly discussed it with Bohr, who was already familiar with all the paper’s components: Bohr himself had conceived the compound-nucleus model; he had discussed the “uranium puzzle” extensively with both Hahn and Meitner; and he surely must have remembered his early work on the dynamics of water drops. Not surprisingly, he understood Frisch at once and exclaimed, “Oh, what idiots we have all been!”


hmmm


	A few days later Bohr set sail for a previously planned visit to the US and immediately plunged into a deep examination of the new phenomenon. He was uniquely well prepared for the undertaking. Although Meitner and Frisch established the plausibility of fission, it was Bohr and his collaborator, Princeton University’s John Wheeler, who showed in detail how it worked.14


Other scientists fix Bhors shit and he immediately goes to U.S. to tell everyone about it (and that it was discovered in Germany)


	Opportunities missed

	When Fermi published the results of his uranium experiments in 1934, his transuranic interpretation was almost universally accepted. However, almost immediately a German chemist, Ida Noddack, pointed out that he had not eliminated the possibility that the bombarded uranium was breaking up into two or more comparably sized nuclei.15 Fermi was aware of her suggestion, and though he never published a refutation, he certainly declined to act on it.
	Postwar reminiscences of Segrè and Amaldi confirm that there was some discussion of Noddack’s paper within Fermi’s group, but there is no clear recollection of why Fermi decided to ignore it.2 In a 1967 interview for the American Institute of Physics, Segrè suggests a personal motive: Although Noddack and her husband, Walter Noddack, enjoyed a solid reputation as the codiscoverers of rhenium, the couple’s incorrect claim to have discovered element 43, technetium, raised suspicion that they were prone to making premature claims in the hope of eventually establishing priority.
	Even more remarkable in Fermi’s indifference to the Noddack proposal was his apparent failure to consider the energetics of a possible uranium fission reaction. Those energetics had already been well established by the time Fermi began bombarding uranium.8 Had he considered them, he would have seen that a fissioning nucleus should release not only an enormous amount of energy but also some free neutrons. The prospect of a fission chain reaction sustained by neutrons would surely have motivated Fermi to pay a little more attention to the Noddack paper.


Fermi unusual in ignoring things that would lead to discovery of Fission


	Actually, preoccupied with the potentialities of the neutron, Hungarian-born physicist Leo Szilard had been searching, unsuccessfully, for just such a chain reaction. When he heard about the experiment of Hahn and Strassmann in 1939, he understood at once the implications, and he and Fermi went on to lead the development of the first nuclear reactor. Had Szilard heard of the Noddack paper in 1934, he would surely have pursued it. That he was unaware of the paper is hardly surprising, given the unfamiliarity of most physicists with the journal in which it was published.
	Indeed, it is as though Noddack’s suggestion had been expunged from the scientific consciousness; Hahn and Strassmann knew of it but did not refer to it in their crucial paper.1 Conceivably, had Noddack’s paper appeared a year or two later, it might have had a bigger impact. From Savić’s reminiscences, it seems clear that if he had been reminded of her proposal while he was confronting the lanthanum problem, he would soon have found the solution.2


Unusual things happened with Noddack's paper which would have led to discovery, "as though had been expunged from the scientific consciousness"


	If the scientific community had taken Noddack’s suggestion a little more seriously, the idea of the Frisch experiment might well have occurred to someone long before 1939. Since the ionization-chamber experiment was no more difficult to execute in 1935 than in 1939, it would surely have been eagerly performed, if only to firmly refute her proposal.
	Curiously enough, Fermi did perform the ionization-chamber experiment, but with a totally different objective: He wanted to see whether or not alphas were emitted by uranium under neutron irradiation. To do so, however, he shielded out the background of low-energy, spontaneously emitted alphas by wrapping his uranium sample in thin aluminum foil. Unfortunately, that foil also stopped the fission fragments, despite their high energy, because of their large charge. Thus Fermi missed the large pulses that Frisch saw. Other groups performing similar experiments apparently did see the characteristic pulses associated with fission but attributed them to bad electronics.2


might have had fission discovery in 1935. Fermi could have discovered but wrapped his uranium in tinfoil for some reason, other's saw signs but chalked up to bad electronics (this is for experiment author says should have done to check Noddack's suggestion)


	Another missed opportunity came in 1936 when Strassmann, the chemist, claimed to have found evidence for barium in neutron-irradiated uranium. Meitner dismissed the conclusion with a remark to the effect of “Leave that to us physicists, and throw your results in the garbage can.”16


Meitner (who delivered fission news discovery to Bohr) dismisses a result pointing to Fission by Strassman in 1936


	...After the saga of near misses and egregious oversights leading up to fission’s discovery, events moved much more quickly. Within a couple of years, the rich brew obtained from neutron-irradiated uranium was shown to contain not only fission products but Fermi’s transuranics, neptunium and plutonium. Likewise, the possibility of fission chain reactions was rapidly confirmed, and that cleared the way for the large-scale release of fission energy both in a controlled form of commercial interest and in a catastrophically explosive form. The first of those two forms was realized with Fermi’s Chicago Pile-1 reactor in December 1942. The second was realized in the summer of 1945, when the fact of fission, in both uranium and plutonium, was brought to the world’s attention in the most dramatic and violent way imaginable.


------


http://www.ushistory.org/us/51f.asp
	Early in 1939, the world's scientific community discovered that German physicists had learned the secrets of splitting a uranium atom. Fears soon spread over the possibility of Nazi scientists utilizing that energy to produce a bomb capable of unspeakable destruction.

	Scientists Albert Einstein, who fled Nazi persecution, and Enrico Fermi, who escaped Fascist Italy, were now living in the United States. They agreed that the President must be informed of the dangers of atomic technology in the hands of the Axis powers. Fermi traveled to Washington in March to express his concerns on government officials. But few shared his uneasiness.

	Einstein penned a letter to President Roosevelt urging the development of an atomic research program later that year. Roosevelt saw neither the necessity nor the utility for such a project, but agreed to proceed slowly. In late 1941, the American effort to design and build an atomic bomb received its code name — the Manhattan Project.


German scientists "leanred the secrets of splitting a uranium atom" in 1939, Einstin and Fermy who escaped fascism to U.S. tell Roosevelt, Fermi visits Washingtonn, Einstein writes letter, Roosevelt drags feet until late 1941.



-------


what's up with Fermi?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Enrico_Fermi
	While writing the appendix for the Italian edition of the book Fundamentals of Einstein Relativity by August Kopff in 1923, Fermi was the first to point out that hidden inside the famous Einstein equation (E = mc2) was an enormous amount of nuclear potential energy to be exploited. "It does not seem possible, at least in the near future", he wrote, "to find a way to release these dreadful amounts of energy—which is all to the good because the first effect of an explosion of such a dreadful amount of energy would be to smash into smithereens the physicist who had the misfortune to find a way to do it."[23]

	In 1924 Fermi was initiated into Freemasonry in the Masonic Lodge "Adriano Lemmi" of the Grand Orient of Italy.[24]


an interesting choice of paragraph arrangement in his Wikipedia article

but I guess he realized the potential for nukes at least by 1923 and was also the type to be in to secret societies


	...Fermi arrived in New York City on 2 January 1939.[62] He was immediately offered posts at five universities, and accepted a post at Columbia University,[63] where he had already given summer lectures in 1936.[64] He received the news that in December 1938, the German chemists Otto Hahn and Fritz Strassmann had detected the element barium after bombarding uranium with neutrons,[65] which Lise Meitner and her nephew Otto Frisch correctly interpreted as the result of nuclear fission. Frisch confirmed this experimentally on 13 January 1939.[66][67] The news of Meitner and Frisch's interpretation of Hahn and Strassmann's discovery crossed the Atlantic with Niels Bohr, who was to lecture at Princeton University. Isidor Isaac Rabi and Willis Lamb, two Columbia University physicists working at Princeton, found out about it and carried it back to Columbia. Rabi said he told Enrico Fermi, but Fermi later gave the credit to Lamb:[68]

	    I remember very vividly the first month, January, 1939, that I started working at the Pupin Laboratories because things began happening very fast. In that period, Niels Bohr was on a lecture engagement at the Princeton University and I remember one afternoon Willis Lamb came back very excited and said that Bohr had leaked out great news. The great news that had leaked out was the discovery of fission and at least the outline of its interpretation. Then, somewhat later that same month, there was a meeting in Washington where the possible importance of the newly discovered phenomenon of fission was first discussed in semi-jocular earnest as a possible source of nuclear power.[69]

	Noddack was proven right after all. Fermi had dismissed the possibility of fission on the basis of his calculations, but he had not taken into account the binding energy that would appear when a nuclide with an odd number of neutrons absorbed an extra neutron.[58] For Fermi, the news came as a profound embarrassment, as the transuranic elements that he had partly been awarded the Nobel Prize for discovering had not been transuranic elements at all, but fission products. He added a footnote to this effect to his Nobel Prize acceptance speech.[68][70]


did Bohr end up keeping the initial news of fission discovery in a close circle for awhile?

the author of this article is more kind to Fermi than others


	...Fermi was among the first to warn military leaders about the potential impact of nuclear energy, giving a lecture on the subject at the Navy Department on 18 March 1939. The response fell short of what he had hoped for, although the Navy agreed to provide $1,500 towards further research at Columbia.[79] Later that year, Szilárd, Eugene Wigner, and Edward Teller sent the famous letter signed by Einstein to U.S. President Roosevelt, warning that Nazi Germany was likely to build an atomic bomb. In response, Roosevelt formed the Advisory Committee on Uranium to investigate the matter.[80]


got in contact with U.S. military


	...In mid-1944, Robert Oppenheimer persuaded Fermi to join his Project Y at Los Alamos, New Mexico.[96] Arriving in September, Fermi was appointed an associate director of the laboratory, with broad responsibility for nuclear and theoretical physics


Oppenheimer invited Fermi to Los Alamos mid 1944


	...Along with Oppenheimer, Compton, and Ernest Lawrence, Fermi was part of the scientific panel that advised the Interim Committee on target selection. The panel agreed with the committee that atomic bombs would be used without warning against an industrial target.[99] Like others at the Los Alamos Laboratory, Fermi found out about the atomic bombings of Hiroshima and Nagasaki from the public address system in the technical area. Fermi did not believe that atomic bombs would deter nations from starting wars, nor did he think that the time was ripe for world government. He therefore did not join the Association of Los Alamos Scientists.


huh


	...Following the detonation of the first Soviet fission bomb in August 1949, Fermi, along with Isidor Rabi, wrote a strongly worded report for the committee, opposing the development of a hydrogen bomb on moral and technical grounds.[112] Nonetheless, Fermi continued to participate in work on the hydrogen bomb at Los Alamos as a consultant. 


Fermi spoke out on H-Bomb but kept working on it


	...Fermi was among the scientists who testified on Oppenheimer's behalf at the Oppenheimer security hearing in 1954 that resulted in denial of Oppenheimer's security clearance.[


testified against Oppenheimer? only says "testified on"


	...Fermi wrote a paper "On the Origin of Cosmic Radiation" in which he proposed that cosmic rays arose through material being accelerated by magnetic fields in interstellar space, which led to a difference of opinion with Teller.[118] Fermi examined the issues surrounding magnetic fields in the arms of a spiral galaxy.[121] He mused about what is now referred to as the "Fermi paradox": the contradiction between the presumed probability of the existence of extraterrestrial life and the fact that contact has not been made.


Fermi wondered about our place in the universe...


	Toward the end of his life, Fermi questioned his faith in society at large to make wise choices about nuclear technology. He said:

	    Some of you may ask, what is the good of working so hard merely to collect a few facts which will bring no pleasure except to a few long-haired professors who love to collect such things and will be of no use to anybody because only few specialists at best will be able to understand them? In answer to such question[s] I may venture a fairly safe prediction.

	    History of science and technology has consistently taught us that scientific advances in basic understanding have sooner or later led to technical and industrial applications that have revolutionized our way of life. It seems to me improbable that this effort to get at the structure of matter should be an exception to this rule. What is less certain, and what we all fervently hope, is that man will soon grow sufficiently adult to make good use of the powers that he acquires over nature.[123]



and thought there wasn't one?



------


https://www.osti.gov/includes/opennet/includes/Oppenheimer%20hearings/Vol%20IIb%20Oppenheimer.pdf


pg 6:

Oppenheimer

	The real ~eason, the weight, behind the report is, in my opinion, a failing of the existence of these weapons would be a diFadvantageous thing. It saye this over and over again. I tnay read, which I am sure bas no security value, from the so-called Minority Report, Fermi and Rabi.

	''The fact that no limits exist to the destructive-ness of .thi~ weapon makes its very existence and the knowledge of ite conFtruction a danger to humanity as a whole. It is necessarily an evil thing considered in any light. For these ressons, we believe it important for the President of the United States to tell the American public and the world that we think it wrong on fundamental ethical principles to initiate the development of f!uch a weapon."

	In the report which got to be known as the Majority Report, which Conant wrote, DuBridge, Buckley and I signed, things are not quite Fo ethical and fundamental, but it says in the final paragraph:

	"In determining not to proceed to develop the Super bomb, we see a unique opportunity of pro-viding bv example ~ome limitations on the totality of war and thu~ of eliminating the fear and arousing the hope of mankind." I think it is very clear that the objection was that we did not like the weapon, not that it couldn't be made. 


Fermi and Rabi wrote or signed a "minority" report opposing H-Bomb. Oppenheimer signed a "majority report" also opposing H-Bomb, but "not quite so ethical and fundamental"

on the reports: https://books.google.com/books?id=E9hKXrghTRYC&pg=PT31&lpg=PT31&dq=Oppenheimer+Fermi+minority+majority+report+bomb&source=bl&ots=jcMIRkBhNX&sig=W9BpuU1yCBDKKPItzdOk-RKzHfE&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjFk4LohfLZAhVo4IMKHd5RCO0Q6AEIUzAF#v=onepage&q=Oppenheimer%20Fermi%20minority%20majority%20report%20bomb&f=false

basically a bunch of scientists opposed H-Bomb and both reports opposed, with minorty report more emphatic

anything unusual here? nothing jumps out. Maybe if the minority report was too preachy it would poison the well, if that makes sense.

also more slimy for Fermi if its true he was working on the H-bomb at the same time


https://www.atomicheritage.org/history/hydrogen-bomb-1950
	In 1942, after creating the first nuclear chain reaction on earth at the Met Lab in Chicago, Enrico Fermi supposed that the fission process that occurred within an atomic bomb could be used to ignite the same sort of thermonuclear reaction that took place inside the center of the sun. He speculated that reactions involving deuterons, the nuclei of the naturally occurring heavy form of hydrogen, would react explosively together under the enormous temperatures created during an atomic explosion and would produce helium and huge amounts of energy.

	When Los Alamos was established, the exploration of the hydrogen bomb was among the original objectives. However, because the development of fission bombs turned out to be more difficult than expected, their development required and received the full attention of the Laboratory. Nonetheless, a small group of theoretical physicists under the direction of Edward Teller made a substantial effort to explore the prospects of a thermonuclear bomb during the war.


Fermi came up with H bomb, small group under E Teller in Manhattan project did early work on it


	...A report on the status of physicists' understanding of the thermonuclear process as of spring 1946 was published in June of that year and was titled "Report of Conference on the Super". Among those who attended the conference were Manhattan Project scientists Edward Teller, John Von Neumann and Stanislaw Ulam. Also in attendance was Dr. Emil Klaus Fuchs who, as it was later learned, was passing on what he knew about atomic research to the Soviet Union. The report judged that the theoretical design submitted to the conference was on the whole "workable" and that the development of a hydrogen bomb was in fact feasible. However, the report also concluded that considerable resources would be needed to develop the Super Bomb and there was no estimates of how much the project would cost or how long it would take to succeed.


Teller and others met in Spring 1946 for reporton feasability on Super. Fuch was there and based it to the Soviets


goes on about debate on whether to build H Bomb


	...The Committee, which was chaired by Robert Oppenheimer, included many of the top-level physicists and technological leaders who had participated in major wartime projects. Other prominent members included James B. Conant, Lee A. DuBridge, Enrico Fermi, I.I. Rabi, Hartley Rowe, Glenn T. Seaborg, Cyril Stanley Smith, and Hood Washington. The committee, which met on October 29-30, 1949, was asked to share its view on the hydrogen bomb and to consider the whether the Atomic Energy Commission was doing enough in its objectives of common defense and security. The GAC published its report, which included three separate sections, on October 30, 1949. The report was almost entirely declassified in 1974.

	...Part III of the report got to the heart of the matter: the question of whether the hydrogen bomb should be developed. The report ultimately concluded that a program to build the super should not be pursued: "Although the members of the Advisory Committee are not unanimous in their proposals as to what should be done with regard to the super bomb, there are certain elements of unanimity among us. We all hope that by one means or another, the development of these weapons can be avoided. We are all reluctant to see the United States take the initiative in precipitating this development. We are all agreed that it would be wrong at the present moment to commit ourselves to an all out effort towards its development."


Oppenheier chaired committee in October 1949 on H-Bomb. Fermi, Rabi, Teller, and Conant also in Committee. Decided H-Bomb could be built but shouldn't.


	With the debate over the hydrogen bomb at a fever pitch, President Truman turned to a special subcommittee of the National Security Council (NSC) for advice. The committee included AEC Chairman David E. Lilienthal, Secretary of Defense Louis Johnson, and Secretary of State Dean Acheson. When the committee first met to discuss the hydrogen bomb on November 30, 1949, Lilienthal not only supported the conclusions of the GAC not to build the super but also urged that one last attempt be made to achieve an international agreement on nuclear energy with the Soviet Union. Johnson and Acheson both supported development of the hydrogen bomb.


Truman intervenes and asks part of NSC for advice, Lilienthal opposed to super and wants to try international agreement with Soviets again (Oppenheimer's a few years before this I think)

JSC asks Truman to go ahead


	...Two and a half years later on November 1, 1952, the United States tested its first ever thermonuclear device at Eniwetok Atoll in the South Pacific. The Mike Shot, as it was known, yielded 10 megatons of TNT and was roughly 1000 times larger than the bomb dropped on Hiroshima seven years earlier. Less than a year later, the Soviets exploded their first thermonuclear weapon. By 1953, the nuclear arms race was on.


	...The King Shot was important because it demonstrated that developing thermonuclear weapons was not the only way to build extremely massive bombs. Ever since JOE-1, many politicians and physicists claimed that the only possible way for America to ensure its security was to produce a much bigger bomb than the Soviets had, and that the only way to do that was through a crash development program of the hydrogen bomb. Hans Bethe, in opposing the crash program for the super, suggested that a bigger bomb could readily be produced by a straightforward extrapolation of the current fission technology.


some politicians and scientists say "only way to ensure security" was to build bigger bombs than the soviets (which politicians and scientists?)


	...The Bravo test explosion yielded more than two and a half times what scientists had expected. The huge explosion released large quantities of radioactive debris into the atmosphere. This resulted in the exposure and contamination of the inhabitants of nearby atolls, as well as some servicemen and the crew of a Japanese fishing trawler ("The Lucky Dragon") which had gone unnoticed in the security zone around the blast. This incident pushed the danger of radioactive fallout from nuclear weapons clearly into the public mind.

	...The United States has never tested a nuclear device bigger than Bravo.  When one such more powerful device was proposed in the mid-1950s by the Livermore laboratory for inclusion in another test series, Eisenhower personally vetoed it on the grounds of its excessive power.


Eisenhower says it went to far


6 years later was tsar bomba

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tsar_Bomba
	Its test on 30 October 1961 remains the most powerful explosive ever detonated. It was also referred to as Kuzma's mother (Russian: Ку́зькина ма́ть, tr. Kúz'kina mát', IPA: [ˈkusʲkʲɪnə ˈmatʲ]),[4] possibly referring to First secretary Nikita Khrushchev's promise to show the United States a Kuzma's mother (an idiom roughly translating to "We'll show you!") at a 1960 session of United Nations General Assembly.[5][6]

	The bomb had a yield of 50 megatons of TNT (210 PJ). In theory, it had a maximum yield of 100 megatons if it were to have included a U-238 tamper, but because only one bomb was built, this was never demonstrated. 


Khrushchev says "we'll show you", detonate 50 Megaton bomb and after that I guess people thought this was silly


------


https://www.wsj.com/articles/review-enrico-fermi-the-last-man-who-knew-everything-1513374523
	Review: Enrico Fermi, ‘The Last Man Who Knew Everything’
	A life of the enigmatic physicist, teacher, mentor and “father of the nuclear age.”
	By Jeremy Bernstein


	...In 1943, the Los Alamos site was opened, and Fermi, his wife and two children were among the early inhabitants. Much later, his wife, Laura, wrote a delightful memoir called “Atoms in the Family.” Fermi witnessed the Trinity atomic test at Alamogordo, N.M., on July 16, 1945, and estimated the bomb’s yield by dropping bits of paper as the supersonic shock wave went by and watching how far they were blown. After the war, Fermi became involved in the committees that advised the government on nuclear energy. He was one of the signers of a vigorous objection to the building of the hydrogen bomb that the called the device “necessarily an evil thing in any light” whose “very existence” was a “danger to humanity as a whole.” The plea was ignored by President Truman, and Fermi, oddly, continued to work on the hydrogen-bomb project.


Why did Truman ignore the plea to not build the H-Bomb? This makes it sound like Fermi's minority report had something to do with it; worth looking into.

Fermi continued working on H-bomb after signing minority report, which the author points out is odd (if he had an excuse it would have had to be a reaally good one)



https://fas.org/rlg/010929-fermi.htm
	Working With Fermi at Chicago and Post-war Los Alamos
	Richard L. Garwin


	...Now in those days, I don't know how it is now, Chicago paid faculty nine-month salaries. They could either starve or get government contracts for the other three months, but I wasn't about to do either. Fermi suggested that I could be a consultant to Los Alamos. Rumor has it, although I don't recall, that I had made some suggestions to him about nuclear weapons and he said that the place to work on such things was Los Alamos. So in 1950, by then Lois and I and our son Jeffrey, went to Los Alamos for three months. Fermi and his wife Laura were there, and, in fact, I shared an office with Enrico Fermi which was a good experience. People would come in and talk to him. During the war he had gone to Los Alamos, not when the laboratory was formed, because he was busy here planning for the plutonium production reactor at Hanford. He went in the Fall of 1944 and stayed at Los Alamos through 1945. He was not in charge of any development group, although there was a Fermi group, but he was a treasured consultant also known as the Pope. Because whatever anybody wanted to know, and couldn't find another way to answer, they would go to Enrico and ask him and one way or another he would either show them how or, in extremis, provide an answer.


Fermi reccomended Garwin work at Los Alamos around 1949-1950. Fermi was a valuable consultant there.


	...Part of my own work that summer of 1950 was beginning an experiment to measure the deuterium-deuterium deuterium-tritium cross-sections which hadn't been measured for ten years previously at the University of Texas. And I thought it was a pretty weak read to lean on in deciding to build hydrogen bombs or not, when you didn't know what the cross-sections were. So I devised an experiment and began to build it there. When I had to leave at the end of the summer to come back to my responsibilities at Chicago, Fermi encouraged Jerry Kellogg and the laboratory director, Norris Bradbury, to import Jim Tuck from England-- he had been at Los Alamos during the war-- to continue this experiment, which was then published in 1954.


Fermi encouraged an experiment that would bear on H-bombs in 1950


	...In 1951 I was back for the summer. I didn't share an office with Fermi. The Physics Division decided I would be better off as a consultant to the Theoretical Division and that's where I was ever after in my summers at Los Alamos. Fermmi was concerned that summer with a large number of things, including Taylor instability. If you have a stable interface like this water, you know, you perturb it and it ripples, and whatnot, and everybody knows that there are waves that run on the surface of the water. Everybody knows also to put a card over a full glass of water and you turn it over (I'm not going to do this for respect for the Ida Noyes Hall and the Max Palevsky Cinema) and the water stays in the glass-- it is stable. But it's meta-stable. If you take the card off, the interface is still supported by the air pressure but the water pretty soon falls out. This is a very important phenomenon in nuclear weaponry and had been plaguing the people at Los Alamos ever since they considered implosion weapons in 1944. Actually they were considered in 1942 but they really had to make them in order to use plutonium in 1944.

	So Fermi had schematized the problem on his blackboard. Everybody knows that in the beginning stages of Taylor instability you assume a ripple on the surface, and instead of behaving sinusoidally in time it behaves exponentially in time with the same time behavior except it's imaginary instead of real or vice versa. So there is a time in which the amplitude doubles; the next interval it quadruples; the next interval it gets to be eight times as big. And pretty soon, of course, this cannot go on because the energy in the instability exceeds the energy that was driving it; the velocity exceeds the velocity of light. And so the question is what happens at large amplitudes? So Fermi said, let me make a model; I'll have a broad tongue which moves into the dense material; I'll have a narrow tongue that moves away from it and I'll just solve this numerically. So he did some of that but he wasn't quite satisfied with the solution. One afternoon around 4:50 p.m. John von Neumann came by and saw what Fermi had on the blackboard and asked what he was doing. So Enrico told him and John von Neumann said "That's very interesting." He came back about 15 minutes later and gave him the answer. Fermi leaned against his doorpost and told me, "You know that man makes me feel I know no mathematics at all."


Fermi took to working on an important hurdle in the H-Bomb. He was working on it for awhile, but wasn't satisfied with his solution. Neumann came, saw  his solution and solve it in 15 minutes

Fermi said 'You know that man makes me feel I know no mathematics at all.'

anything weird going on here? Fermi had a habit of doing his calculations and experiments wrong in unusual ways before, or missing things in unusual ways

	
	There was another time at Chicago where our colleague, Edward Teller, who was also on the faculty (although you couldn't tell it by the amount of time he spent here) came by and told Fermi of his most recent enthusiasm. And as Teller left, Fermi commented, "That's the one monomaniac I know with more than one mania."


Fermi dissing teller

why does author mention this?


	...By 1954 I had worked for a year (sort of half-time) on air defense of the United States and had made contact with people in Washington outside the nuclear weapons community. So hearing of Fermi's illness I returned, I think, in October and saw him in his house. He clearly had an inoperable cancer. And we talked. He regretted not having been more concerned about public policy. I was, of course, terribly saddened that Enrico Fermi was taken from us at the age of 53; I just imagine the joy that he would have experienced had he been around to see the evolution of computers and the development of physics, and the role that he might have played if he had been given another 20 or 30 years. Thank you.


Fermi got cancer young. He told author he regretted not having been more concerned about public policy.


------


https://archive.nytimes.com/www.nytimes.com/learning/general/onthisday/bday/0929.html
	CHICAGO, Nov. 28--Dr. Enrico Fermi, an architect of the atomic age and Nobel Prize winner, died at his home here this morning of cancer. His age was 53.

	He had undergone what was described as an "exploratory" operation in Billings Memorial Hospital on Oct. 9. He returned to his home several weeks ago. 


	... After Dr. Fermi had set the atomic furnace into successful operation in 1942, Dr. Arthur Holly Compton, now of Washington University, St. Louis, and director of the Metallurgical Laboratory, telephoned an impromptu coded message to Dr. James B. Conant, then president of Harvard University and also head of the National Defense Research Committee.

	Dr. Compton said "The Italian navigator arrived at the shores of the new world." Dr. Conant asked, "How were the natives?" Dr. Compton replied: "Very friendly." That meant the first atomic fire in history had been kindled. 


is that what it meant? who knows...


	... Dr. Fermi, unhappy in Mussolini's Italy, especially from the time the Italian dictator began promulgating anti-Semitic laws to please Hitler, took the opportunity to escape from the Fascist-ridden land when he received the Nobel Prize in physics in the autumn of 1938. Leaving Italy with his wife and two young children to go to Stockholm, ostensibly for the purpose of receiving the prize, he told the Italian authorities he had accepted a temporary teaching post in an American university. He arrived in New York on Jan. 2, 1939, and quietly assumed a permanent post on the physics faculty at Columbia University. 

	... Dr. Bohr arrived in New York Jan. 16, 1939, and at once communicated the news to physicists in Princeton. Soon it reached Dr. Fermi at Columbia, who communicated it to other colleagues. On the night of Jan. 25, 1939, in the basement of Pupin Hall on the Columbia campus, the first splitting of the uranium atom in America took place. It was not long before the epoch-making experiment was carried out in many other American universities.

	Dr. Fermi and the other physicists, particularly the exiles from Nazi and Fascist- dominated lands, realized from the beginning that "the world was in for trouble." 


author points out Fermi came at opportune time. Nobel prize gave him opportunity to leave. (one day will have to look at Nobel committee...)


	...As early as March, 1939, less than three months after his arriving in the United States, Dr. Fermi, armed with a letter of introduction from Columbia to Admiral S. C. Hooper, in Washington, tried to interest the Navy Department in the possibility of an atomic bomb. At that conference the physicist "suggested the possibility of achieving a controllable reaction using slow neutrons or a reaction of an explosive character using fast neutrons."

	Meantime, Dr. Fermi and the other exiled physicists had learned through former colleagues in Germany that the Nazis had created a special institute in Berlin to which they had assigned some of their top scientists to work on an atomic bomb. Realizing the danger that confronted the free world, they induced the most famous scientist-exile among them, Albert Einstein, to write the historic letter to President Franklin D. Roosevelt that led to the eventual development of the $2,000,000,000 Manhattan District, as the atomic project was known.


after hearing from Bohr, Fermi tried to interest Navy in a-bomb, then heard from "former colleagues in Germany" that Nazis made special institute for a-bomb. He and other "exiled physicists" who heard same thing "induced" Einstein into writing that letter to Roosevelt.

	
	Dr. Fermi, in association with Leo Szilard, another exile, then began work at Columbia on the construction of the first experimental atomic "piles." By the time the Government was ready to support the project with substantial funds, the Fermi-Szilard team had laid down the groundwork that made the first chain reaction "pile" possible. 


then started preliminary work on a-bomb at Columbia


	...It was he, when still a young man of 33, who first used the neutron, discovered in 1932 by Sir James Chadwick of Cambridge University, England, as a modern Philosophers' Stone for the transmutation of the elements and the creation of more than forty artificial radioactive isotopes.

	It was in the course of these pioneer experiments that he bombarded uranium with neutrons and observed the strange phenomena that remained a puzzle for five years, until they were cleared up by the discovery of Hahn and Strassmann in December, 1938. It was then that Dr. Fermi and the rest of the scientific world realized that the strange phenomena they had been observing and could not explain were in actuality the fission of uranium. 


"strange phenomena that remained a puzzle for five years" a little much?

weren't exactly a puzzle since Noddack pointed out solution it was just ignored for awhile

article could be read as author having fun with that


...

motive for Fermi was supposedly hearing that the Nazis had an a-bomb project


-----


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/German_nuclear_weapon_project
	The German nuclear weapon project (German: Uranprojekt; informally known as the Uranverein; English: Uranium Society or Uranium Club) was a scientific effort led by Germany to develop and produce nuclear weapons during World War II. The first effort started in April 1939, just months after the discovery of nuclear fission in December 1938, but ended only months later due to the German invasion of Poland, after many notable physicists were drafted into the Wehrmacht.


looks like Fermi was right... sort of


	...October 1944 – alleged Lüneburger Heide atom bomb test

	On 23 February 2017, German-speaking British journalist Allan Hall, published an article in the Daily Mirror entitled 'Secret files reveal Nazis 'tested nuclear bomb' before end of WW2 as Adolf Hitler plotted to decimate Britain'. He quotes German 'Bild' paper and cites U.S. National Archives intelligence reports file, APO 696, which, he says, contains two eyewitness accounts of a Nazi atomic bomb test in 'early October 1944'.

	    Documents unearthed in an American archive suggest that Nazi Germany may have tested an operational nuclear bomb before the end of World War Two.

	    Recently declassifed file APO 696 from the National Archives in Washington is a detailed survey of how far Third Reich scientists got in the development of an atomic bomb – something leader Adolf Hitler craved.
	    In the file, obtained by the popular daily newspaper Bild, the task of the academics who prepared the paper between 1944 and 1947 was the “investigations, research, developments and practical use of the German atomic bomb.”[120]

	The interviewees describe seeing a 'mushroom cloud' near the North German town of Ludwigslust, close to the Lüneburger Heide (Luneburg Heath) near the city of Hamburg.

	This report was corroborated in January 2018 in a BCFM radio interview with Argentinian born blogger, son of a Nazi scientist and former Swiss banker, Manfred Petritsch. He cites conversations with an unnamed former Nazi scientist [121] who says two German wartime atomic bomb tests took place, one at the 'Lüneburger Heide' and one 'on a North Sea Island', possibly Heligoland, which is well away from the mainland. Petritsch also suggests that Nazi expertise was essential for the Manhattan Project's Trinity test to be successful, which, he says, is why the first test didn't take place until Nazi scientists had been captured and debriefed by the Allies.


Nazi nukes?

guessing no

can think of reasons why someone would want to make that up though, especially during the war

above in wiki article sounds like some active measures to kill Nazi nuclear program a few times



http://www.spiegel.de/international/spiegel/the-third-reich-how-close-was-hitler-to-the-a-bomb-a-346293.html
	How close was Hitler to an atomic bomb? A German historian claims he was much closer than previously believed.

	The United States needed 125,000 people, including six future Nobel Prize winners, to develop the atomic bombs that exploded over Hiroshima and Nagasaki in 1945. The uranium enrichment facility alone, including its security zone, was the size of the western German city of Frankfurt. Dubbed the Manhattan project, the quest ultimately cost the equivalent of about $30 billion.

	In his new book, "Hitler's Bomb," Berlin historian Rainer Karlsch claims Nazi Germany almost achieved similar results with only a handful of physicists and a fraction of the budget. The author writes that German physicists and members of the military conducted three nuclear weapons tests shortly before the end of World War II, one on the German island of Ruegen in the fall of 1944 and two in the eastern German state of Thuringia in March 1945. The tests, writes Karlsch, claimed up to 700 lives.

	If these theories were accurate, history would have to be rewritten. Ever since the Allies occupied the Third Reich's laboratories and interrogated Germany's top physicists working with wunderkind physicist Werner Heisenberg and his colleague Carl Friedrich von Weizsäcker, it's been considered certain that Hitler's scientists were a long way from completing a nuclear weapon.

	...His witnesses either lack credibility or have no first-hand knowledge of the events described in the book. What Karlsch insists are key documents can, in truth, be interpreted in various ways, some of which contradict his theory. Finally, the soil sample readings taken thus far at the detonation sites provide "no indication of the explosion of an atomic bomb," says Gerald Kirchner of Germany's Federal Office for Radiation Protection.

	Karlsch spent several years in archives researching his subject, discovering many unknown documents on the history of science in the Third Reich. That includes a manuscript of one of Heisenberg's speeches which historians had previoulsy assumed had been lost. The manuscript alone would have been a significant find, but it wasn't enough to satisfy Karlsch or fully support his offbeat theory. As a result, in order to give his theory wings, he had to make some speculative leaps.


Karlsch says he found proof Nazis were close, but author is skeptical


	...The biggest hole in Karlsch's argument stems from his inablility to prove how the Diebner group managed to implement Schumann's ideas. According to Karlsch, Diebner and his colleagues used a special device that combined nuclear fission and fusion to initiate a chain reaction. With the help of physicists, Karlsch came up with a design for such a weapon and presents it in his book. Joachim Schulze, a nuclear weapons expert at Germany's Fraunhofer Institute, took a look at Karlsch's model and said it would be "incapable of functioning."

	Another theory Karlsch presents in his book -- that the Germany navy tested a nuclear weapon on the Baltic Sea island of Ruegen -- is nothing short of fantastic. His key witness is Luigi Romersa, a former war reporter for a Milan newspaper, Corriere della Sera. For years Romersa, a Roman who is now 87, has been telling the story of how he visited Hitler in October 1944 and then was flown to an island in the Baltic Sea. Romersa says that he was taken to a dugout where he witnessed an explosion that produced a bright light, and that men wearing protective suits then drove him away from the site, telling him that what he had witnessed was a "fission bomb."

	Unfortunately, Romersa doesn't recall the name of the island he claims to have visited or who was in charge of the bizarre event. Karlsch believes it was Ruegen. He dismisses the fact that soil analysis shows no evidence of a nuclear explosion by pointing to erosion.

	A more credible witness is the recently deceased Thuringian resident Clare Werner. On March 4, 1945, Werner, who was standing on a nearby hillside, witnessed an explosion in a military training area near the town of Ohrdruf.

	"It was about 9:30 when I suddenly saw something ... it was as bright as hundreds of bolts of lightning, red on the inside and yellow on the outside, so bright you could've read the newspaper. It all happened so quickly, and then we couldn't see anything at all. We just noticed there was a powerful wind..." The woman complained of "nose bleeds, headaches and pressure in the ears."

	The next day Heinz Wachsmut, a man who worked for a local excavating company, was ordered to help the SS build wooden platforms on which the corpses of prisoners were cremated. The bodies, according to Wachsmut, were covered with horrific burn wounds. Like Werner, Wachsmut reports that local residents complained of headaches, some even spitting up blood.

	In Wachsmut's account, higher-ranking SS officers told people that something new had been tested, something the entire world would soon be talking about. Of course, there was no mention of nuclear weapons.

	Did Stalin hear reports about the weapon?

	And what about the 700 victims, supposedly concentration camp inmates, Karlsch claims died in the tests? This impressive figure is nothing but an estimate based on the number of cremation sites Wachsmut recalls. However, on the reputed detonation date, the Ohrdruf concentration camp, part of the larger Buchenwald complex, recorded ony 35 dead.

	Another piece of evidence Karlsch cites is a March 1945 Soviet military espionage report. According to the report, which cites a "reliable source," the Germans "detonated two large explosions in Thuringia." The bombs, the Soviet spies wrote, presumably contained uranium 235, a material used in nuclear weapons, and produced a "highly radioactive effect." Prisoners of war housed at the center of the detonation were killed, "and in many cases their bodies were completely destroyed."

	The Red Army's spies noted with concern that the Germany army could "slow down our offensive" with its new weapon. The fact that dictator Josef Stalin received one of the four copies of the report shows just how seriously the Kremlin took the news.

	Unfortunately, the document Karlsch presents is of such poor quality that it cannot be clearly determined whether the report describing the explosions was written before or after the detonation Clare Werner claims to have witnessed.

	More importantly, however, what Clare Werner claims to have seen could not have a detonation of the type of bomb the German informer sketched for the Red Army. That type of device would have required several kilograms of highly enriched uranium, which all experts, including Karlsch, believe Nazi Germany did not possess.

	There is one expert who the author, and his boastful publisher, hopes will support his theories. Uwe Keyser, a nuclear physicist who works for Germany's Federal Institute of Physics and Technology in Braunschweig, is currently testing soil samples from Ohrdruf. Keyser believes that the readings for radioactive substances he has obtained so far are sufficiently abnormal so as not to rule out the explosion of a simple nuclear device. Of course, Keyser's readings could also be caused by naturally occurring processes, material left behind by Soviet forces stationed in Ohrdruf until 1994 or fallout from the Chernobyl disaster or nuclear weapons tests conducted by the superpowers.

	Keyser says he needs "about a year" to conduct a more precise analysis. He also needs someone to continue footing the bill.


if author wants to shoot down Karlsch theories, he doesn't do a very good job


interesting that Soviet intel had reports of a Nazi atom bomb

whether true or false, it would go a long way toward motivating agents to spy on Manhattan project, or even start the Manhattan project and give the results to the Soviets


------

motivated U.S. certainly:


https://www.atomicheritage.org/history/german-atomic-bomb-project
	...A “Race” for the Bomb

	The United States government became aware of the German nuclear program in August 1939, when Albert Einstein wrote to President Roosevelt, warning "that it may become possible to set up a nuclear chain reaction in a large mass of uranium by which vast amounts of power and large quantities of new radium-like elements would be generated." The United States was in a race to develop an atomic bomb believing whoever had the bomb first would win the war.

says U.S. gov became aware of nazi nuke program from Einstein letter


	Robert Furman, assistant to General Leslie Groves and the Chief of Foreign Intelligence for the Manhattan Project, described how “the Manhattan Project was built on fear: fear that the enemy had the bomb, or would have it before we could develop it. The scientists knew this to be the case because they were refugees from Germany, a large number of them, and they had studied under the Germans before the war broke out.” 


kindof harrowing quote.

bomb really needed war to happen, even the holocaust played into it


	Manhattan Project physicist Leona Marshall Libby also recalled, “I think everyone was terrified that we were wrong, and the Germans were ahead of us.… Germany led the civilized world of physics in every aspect, at the time war set in, when Hitler lowered the boom. It was a very frightening time.”

	The United States government remained equally afraid. General Groves remembered, “Unless and until we had positive knowledge to the contrary, we had to assume that the most competent German scientists and engineers were working on an atomic program with the full support of their government and with the full capacity of German industry at their disposal. Any other assumption would have been unsound and dangerous” (Norris 295). There was even consideration of kidnapping Werner Heisenberg in Switzerland in 1942, although this plan never came to fruition. In 1943, the United States launched the Alsos Mission, a foreign intelligence project focused on learning the extent of Germany’s nuclear program.



Groves says "unless we find otherwise assume they have the bomb"

except if its a secret project you might never find proof...


	...By 1944, however, the evidence was clear: the Germans had not come close to developing a bomb and had only advanced to preliminary research. Following the German defeat, the Allies detained ten German scientists, at Farm Hall, a bugged house in Godmanchester, England, from July 3, 1945 to January 3, 1946. Some of them, such as Heisenberg, Kurt Diebner, and Carl von Weiszacker were directly involved in the project, while others, such as Otto Hahn and Max von Laue, were only suspected and later proven to have not been involved. Heisenberg's disbelief after hearing that the United States had dropped an atomic bomb on Hiroshima confirmed in the minds of the Allies that the German effort was never close. As one German scientist exclaimed, it must have taken "factories large as the United States to make that much uranium-235!"


where they hung up on uranium? that played out in the Soviet espionage, where a big secret they got was finding out how to produce material for bomb

sounds like if they were in a bugged house they'd know it, though


	...The German project had fundamental flaws from its conception. Many top German scientists had left Germany, some of them Jewish émigrés fleeing the new laws of German National Socialism. Other scientists left in protest, significantly decreasing the number of experts available to work on a German bomb. A substantial number eventually came to the United States to work on the Manhattan Project. The bigger problem, however, lay in lack of support. Hitler was much more interested in developing the V-2, a long-range ballistic missile.

	...Another problem was coordination among different departments. To begin with, communications between different areas were extremely poor.

	...Furthermore, Speer was reluctant to bring up the bomb project with Hitler himself unless he could produce clear results. This led to misinformation and misunderstanding, seen clearly when Hitler suggested to Speer that the bomb “would throw a man off his horse at a distance of over two miles” (Powers 151). Heisenberg’s frustrations were evident when, at Farm Hall, he remarked, “The point is that the whole structure of the relationship between the scientist and the state in Germany was such that although we were not 100% anxious to do it, on the other hand we were so little trusted by the state that even if we had wanted to do it, it would not have been easy to get it through.”


cites reasons for no progress on Bomb: Hitler more interested in V-2, "poor communication" between departments, and Albert Speer reluctance to bring up with Hitler


	...Allegations of Sabotage

	A popular theory for the failure of the German project is that Heisenberg deliberately aborted it so that Hitler would not have the atomic bomb.  But there remains little evidence of this. Heisenberg's 1941 meeting in Copenhagen with Niels Bohr, who would later work on the Manhattan Project, was dramatized in the 1998 play Copenhagen. The play explores three scenarios where Heisenberg discusses his dilemma with Bohr, but leaves the matter for audiences to decide what Heisenberg actually believed and intended to do. 


...sabotage?

Heisenberg accused of sabotage, he secretly met with Niels Bohr and there's  a play about it


	...Heisenberg did however tell Bohr that the German project was underway, and drew a simple sketch, which Bohr thought to be a bomb. Infuriated by Heisenberg, who he thought “is not being honest, or he is being used by the Nazi government,” Bohr refused to speak with him more and eventually turned the sketch over to Manhattan Project scientists, who identified it as the outline of a reactor (Powers 126).  J. Robert Oppenheimer later recalled, “Bohr had the impression that they came less to tell what they knew than to see if Bohr knew anything that they did not; I believe it was a standoff.” As his son Aage Bohr explained, “He had the impression that Heisenberg thought that the new possibilities could decide the outcome of the war if the war dragged on” (Rhodes 385).


some shit going on here

TODO: look into this later


	Despite some misgivings about building a bomb, throughout the war Heisenberg maintained a genuine loyalty to his country. Richard Rhodes recalled, “There was at least one speculation that one of the German scientists deliberately falsified the measurements in graphite, hoping to stop a German bomb program. I don’t think there’s really evidence to support that. It seems to have been a mistake in the course of developing these various components of the technology.” Historians generally agree that the problems with the German project stemmed from serious miscalculations and a lack of priority. The allegations of sabotage carry little weight.


...


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Werner_Heisenberg
	...After Adolf Hitler came to power in 1933, Heisenberg was attacked in the press as a "White Jew"[39] by elements of the Deutsche Physik (German Physics) movement for his insistence on teaching about the roles of Jewish scientists. As a result, he came under investigation by the SS. This was over an attempt to appoint Heisenberg as successor to Arnold Sommerfeld at the University of Munich. The issue was resolved in 1938 by Heinrich Himmler, head of the SS. While Heisenberg was not chosen as Sommerfeld's successor, he was rehabilitated to the physics community during the Third Reich. Nevertheless, supporters of Deutsche Physik launched vicious attacks against leading theoretical physicists, including Arnold Sommerfeld and Heisenberg. On 29 June 1936, a Nazi Party newspaper published a column attacking Heisenberg. On 15 July 1937, he was attacked in a journal of the SS. This was the beginning of what is called the Heisenberg Affair.[23]

	...During this time, Heisenberg came under vicious attack by the Deutsche Physik supporters. One attack was published in Das Schwarze Korps, the newspaper of the Schutzstaffel (SS), headed by Heinrich Himmler. In this, Heisenberg was called a "White Jew" (i.e. an Aryan who acts like a Jew) who should be made to "disappear".[60] These attacks were taken seriously, as Jews were violently attacked and incarcerated. Heisenberg fought back with an editorial and a letter to Himmler, in an attempt to resolve this matter and regain his honour.

	...From 24 January to 4 February 1944, Heisenberg travelled to occupied Copenhagen, after the German army confiscated Bohr's Institute of Theoretical Physics. He made a short return trip in April. In December, Heisenberg lectured in neutral Switzerland.[23] The United States Office of Strategic Services sent former major league baseball catcher and OSS agent Moe Berg to attend the lecture carrying a pistol, with orders to shoot Heisenberg if his lecture indicated that Germany was close to completing an atomic bomb. Heisenberg did not give such an indication, so Berg decided not to shoot him, a decision Berg later described as his own "uncertainty principle".[75]

	...Heisenberg had been captured and arrested by Colonel Pash at Heisenberg's retreat in Urfeld, on 3 May 1945, in an alpine operation in territory still under control by German forces. He was taken to Heidelberg, where, on 5 May, he met Goudsmit for the first time since the Ann Arbor visit in 1939. Germany surrendered just two days later. Heisenberg did not see his family again for eight months. Heisenberg was moved across France and Belgium and flown to England on 3 July 1945.[102][103][104]


press, OSS, and Pash when after Heisenberg

not sure what's going on with Heisenberg and Himmler

Bohr also trashed him suggesting he was a German agent


------


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Einstein%E2%80%93Szil%C3%A1rd_letter
	Szilárd was concerned that German scientists might also attempt this experiment. The German nuclear physicist Siegfried Flügge published two influential articles on the exploitation of nuclear energy in 1939.[4][5] After discussing this prospect with fellow Hungarian physicist Eugene Wigner, they decided that they should warn the Belgians, as the Belgian Congo was the best source of uranium ore. Wigner suggested that Albert Einstein might be a suitable person to do this, as he knew the Belgian Royal Family.[6]


is this what spooked Szilard? other accounts have German scientists going to Bohr and Bohr going to U.S. scientists


	...On July 12, 1939, Szilárd and Wigner drove in Wigner's car to Cutchogue on New York's Long Island, where Einstein was staying.[9] When they explained about the possibility of atomic bombs, Einstein replied: Daran habe ich gar nicht gedacht (I did not even think about that).[10] Szilárd dictated a letter in German to the Belgian Ambassador to the United States. Wigner wrote it down, and Einstein signed it. At Wigner's suggestion, they also prepared a letter for the State Department explaining what they were doing and why, giving it two weeks to respond if it had any objections.[9]


they approached Einstein with this letter to Belgium first


	This still left the problem of getting government support for uranium research. Another friend of Szilárd's, the Austrian economist Gustav Stolper, suggested approaching Alexander Sachs, who had access to President Franklin D. Roosevelt. Sachs told Szilárd that he had already spoken to the President about uranium, but that Fermi and Pegram had reported that the prospects for building an atomic bomb were remote. He told Szilárd that he would deliver the letter, but suggested that it come from someone more prestigious. For Szilárd, Einstein was again the obvious choice.[6] Sachs and Szilárd drafted a letter riddled with spelling errors and mailed it to Einstein.[11]

	Szilárd set out for Long Island again on August 2. Wigner was unavailable, so this time Szilárd co-opted another Hungarian physicist, Edward Teller, to do the driving. Einstein dictated the letter in German. On returning to Columbia University, Szilárd dictated the letter in English to a young departmental stenographer, Janet Coatesworth. She later recalled that when Szilárd mentioned extremely powerful bombs, she "was sure she was working for a nut".[12] Ending the letter with "Yours truly, Albert Einstein" did nothing to alter this impression. Both the letter and a longer explanatory letter were then posted to Einstein.[12]

	The letter warned that:

	    "In the course of the last four months it has been made probable — through the work of Joliot in France as well as Fermi and Szilárd in America — that it may become possible to set up a nuclear chain reaction in a large mass of uranium, by which vast amounts of power and large quantities of new radium-like elements would be generated. Now it appears almost certain that this could be achieved in the immediate future.

	    This new phenomenon would also lead to the construction of bombs, and it is conceivable — though much less certain — that extremely powerful bombs of a new type may thus be constructed. A single bomb of this type, carried by boat and exploded in a port, might very well destroy the whole port together with some of the surrounding territory. However, such bombs might very well prove to be too heavy for transportation by air."[13]

	It also specifically warned about Germany:

	    "I understand that Germany has actually stopped the sale of uranium from the Czechoslovakian mines which she has taken over. That she should have taken such early action might perhaps be understood on the ground that the son of the German Under-Secretary of State, von Weizsäcker, is attached to the Kaiser-Wilhelm-Institut in Berlin where some of the American work on uranium is now being repeated."[13]


that got Einstein to sign a letter with conspiracy theories and send it to us gov


letter to delayed for delivery until after start of war

Einstein sent two more letters and Szilard drafted another


also:


	...Einstein did not work on the Manhattan Project. The Army denied him the work clearance needed in July 1940, saying his pacifist leanings made him a security risk


but Oppenheimer was allowed on?

and a few dozen Soviet spies

for Oppenheimer specifically they said "well you're red and have card carry communist friends brother and wife but we need talent so we'll let you in"

for Einstein, literally Einstein, they say "sorry you are too pacifist and a security risk" even though he wrote them four letters asking them to beat the nazis to the bomb


although:

	...According to Linus Pauling, Einstein later regretted signing the letter because it led to the development and use of the atomic bomb in combat, adding that Einstein had justified his decision because of the greater danger that Nazi Germany would develop the bomb first.[26] In 1947 Einstein told Newsweek magazine that "had I known that the Germans would not succeed in developing an atomic bomb, I would have done nothing."



...


http://www.atomicarchive.com/Docs/Begin/Einstein.shtml
Albert Einstein

	F.D. Roosevelt

	Sir:

	Some recent work by E. Fermi and L. Szilard, which has been communicated to me in manuscript, leads me to expect that the element uranium may be turned into a new and important source of energy in the immediate future. Certain aspects of the situation which has arisen seem to call for watchfulness and if necessary, quick action on the part of the Administration.


The experiments Fermi and Szilard starting doing in Columbia led directly to this


	...In the course of the last four months it has been made probable through the work of Joliot in France as well as Fermi and Szilard in America--that it may be possible to set up a nuclear chain reaction in a large mass of uranium, by which vast amounts of power and large quantities of new radium-like elements would be generated. Now it appears almost certain that this could be achieved in the immediate future. 


also Joliot in France


	...This new phenomenon would also lead to the construction of bombs, and it is conceivable--though much less certain--that extremely powerful bombs of this type may thus be constructed. A single bomb of this type, carried by boat and exploded in a port, might very well destroy the whole port together with some of the surrounding territory. However, such bombs might very well prove too heavy for transportation by air. 


why would he say that?

	The United States has only very poor ores of uranium in moderate quantities. There is some good ore in Canada and former Czechoslovakia, while the most important source of uranium is in the Belgian Congo. 

	In view of this situation you may think it desirable to have some permanent contact maintained between the Administration and the group of physicists working on chain reactions in America. One possible way of achieving this might be for you to entrust the task with a person who has your confidence and who could perhaps serve in an unofficial capacity. His task might comprise the following:

	a) to approach Government Departments, keep them informed of the further development, and put forward recommendations for Government action, giving particular attention to the problem of securing a supply of uranium ore for the United States.

	b) to speed up the experimental work, which is at present being carried on within the limits of the budgets of University laboratories, by providing funds, if such funds be required, through his contacts with private persons who are willing to make contributions for this cause, and perhaps also by obtaining co-operation of industrial laboratories which have necessary equipment. 


Einstein says its all about Uranium, don't have much, there is some in Czhechoslovakia, Canada, and Congo

recomends keeping in touch with "the group of physicists working on chain reactions in Amierica" (so Femri and Slizard, the ones he just named?)

suggests find someone "in unnoficial capacity" you can trust to be liason between physicists and gov deparments, pay special attention on how to get uranium, fund university work (presumably on bomb) to speed it up, provide funds through private persons, maybe get industrial laboratories involved


so Einstein is proposing a secret unofficial project to secure funds and contact researchers already doing work on fission

if set up this way, they'd be starting from Fermi and Slizard and doing everything in a back-channel way with no oversight. In other words would be stupidly easy to have foreign agents penetrate the project, they'd end up being the ones already working on it.


	...I understand that Germany has actually stopped the sale of uranium from the Czechoslovakian mines which she has taken over. That she should have taken such early action might perhaps be understood on the ground that the son of the German Under-Secretary of State, von Weizsacker, is attached to the Kaiser-Wilhelm Institute in Berlin, where some of the American work on uranium is now being repeated. 


ends with ominous warning that Uranium mines in Germany mysteriously stopped sale, and the son of someone from German Foreign Minstry is "attached to" (sounds secretive like attached in spying sense?) uni in Berlin where same experiments happening

it makes it sound like Germans have same secret structure for research

whole first part sets up last paragraph

describes structure a secret project could have with secret liason between gov and scientists in universities

says it's super important to get uranium the most important thing (as if they would run out of it to make a bomb)

then ends with: Germans have gov guy in Berlin where similar research is happening and they closed their uranium mine for selling


also it looks like they listened to this letter for the uranium...

https://theconversation.com/the-link-between-uranium-from-the-congo-and-hiroshima-a-story-of-twin-tragedies-64329
	The US arranged for its wartime intelligence agency, the Office of Strategic Services, to send agents to the Congo to protect the transit of the ore and to prevent smuggling to Germany.

	The story of these courageous agents – and the dangers they encountered from Nazi sympathisers in the mining multinationals and the Belgian colonial administration – has been secret until now.



https://www.space.com/25692-manhattan-project-einstein-szilard-blackmail.html
	Seventy-five years ago, Hungarian-American physicist Leo Szilard wrote a letter to United States President Franklin Roosevelt expressing concern that German scientists would soon unlock the secrets to developing the first atomic bomb.

	Concerned that his relative anonymity would cause the warning to go unheeded, Szilard persuaded his friend and colleague Albert Einstein to sign the letter. The Einstein-Szilard letter resulted in the establishment of the Manhattan Project, and the United States' subsequent creation of the world's first nuclear weapon.


Szilard wrote it and somehow convinced Einstein to sign it


article goes on to say one of the letters was essentially blackmail on the government, which involved threatening to publish atomic information


------


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Leo_Szilard

Szilard barely survived WWI and particiapted in socialism during bela kun, founded socialist group that was not in full agreement with Bela Kun (I think?)


worth looking into because this guy basically started the bomb


	...He rejoined his regiment in May 1918 but in September, before being sent to the front, he fell ill with Spanish Influenza and was returned home for hospitalization.[9] Later he was informed that his regiment had been nearly annihilated in battle, so the illness probably saved his life.[10] He was discharged honorably in November 1918, after the Armistice.[11]


never made it to front lines of WWI


	In January 1919, Szilard resumed his engineering studies, but Hungary was in a chaotic political situation with the rise of the Hungarian Soviet Republic under Béla Kun. Szilard and his brother Béla founded their own political group, the Hungarian Association of Socialist Students, with a platform based on a scheme of Szilard's for taxation reform. He was convinced that socialism was the answer to Hungary's post-war problems, but not that of Kun's Hungarian Socialist Party, which had close ties to the Soviet Union.[12] When Kun's government tottered, the brothers officially changed their religion from "Israelite" to "Calvinist", but when they attempted to re-enroll in what was now the Budapest University of Technology, they were prevented from doing so by nationalist students because they were Jews.[13]


potporri paragraph wonder what the author was thinking


...


http://digitalcommons.calpoly.edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?article=1057&amp;context=phy_fac
	Lanouette's book does justice to the man who propelled the world across thenuclear Rubicon with the Einstein-Szilard letter to Roosevelt (p. 205): "Some recent work by E. Fermi and L. Szilard, which has been communicated to me in manu­script, leads me to expect that the element uranium may be turned into a  new and important source of energy in the immediate future···. This new phenomenon would also lead to the construction of bombs" .[which] might very well destroy the whole port together with some of the sur­rounding territory." 


kindof weird--if Szilard wrote the letter, why does it refer to him in third person, incinuate that Szilard should be contacted for this work, and appear like it was written by Einstein on its face?


	...Szilard was an intuitive applied physicist whose thumb prints are on applied technologies (thermal reactors, breeder reactors, atom bombs, electromagnetic pumps, electron microscopes, and information theory) rather than on fundamental science. Lanouette shows that Szilard was politically very astute. He realized early on that Hitler could get the bomb and that a  nuclear arms race would follow the first nuclear weapons. Szilard, driven by these political concerns, acted boldly: he secretly patented the nuclear chain reaction in 1934; he tried to get other phys­icists not to publish nuclear data, but after they published, he too published; he wrote three Einstein-Szilard letters (two to begin the Manhattan Project and one to slow it); he created much of the Franck report, which called for an initial demonstration explosion over Japan rather than city destruction; he lobbied Congress for civilian control of the atom and various other arms control matters; he helped organize the Federation of Atomic Scientists, the Pugwash meetings, and the Council for a  Livable World; and he initiated the creation of the Salk Institute to study both science and its impacts. 


said to be "politically astute"

two letters to begin Manhattan project and one to slow it--why?

this is odd on its face, since you'd think finishing the Manhattan proejct fast would have at least one benefit for humanity: a chance to end the war earlier

lobbied for not using bomb on Japanese civilians--did he have a conscience after all, or was it more like Fermi's "speaking out" against h-bomb?

said to have "unpredicable personality," author suggests driven by anti-Semetic instability in Eruope


	...Lanouette ar­gues that Szilard was the first to conceive of the bomb and among the first to initiate arms control movements because he was so contrary and difficult. 


could be? Oppenheimer was like that

problem is Szliard was involved with hard to explain things that look like active measures early on



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Salted_bomb
	A salted bomb is a nuclear weapon designed to function as a radiological weapon, producing enhanced quantities of radioactive fallout, rendering a large area uninhabitable.[1] The term is derived both from the means of their manufacture, which involves the incorporation of additional elements to a standard atomic weapon, and from the expression "to salt the earth", meaning to render an area uninhabitable for generations. The idea originated with Hungarian-American physicist Leo Szilard, in February 1950. His intent was not to propose that such a weapon be built, but to show that nuclear weapon technology would soon reach the point where it could end human life on Earth.[1][2]


spy or not, there's something very off with this guy


...


https://blogs.scientificamerican.com/the-curious-wavefunction/why-the-world-needs-more-leo-szilards/
	Why the world needs more Leo Szilards

	By Ashutosh Jogalekar 

	...During his later years Szilard once told an audience, "Physics and politics were my two great interests". Throughout his life he would try to forge the essential partnership between the two which he thought was necessary to save the human species from annihilation.

	...But Szilard was also the quintessential example of a multifaceted individual. If you look at the essential events of the man's life you can see several Szilards, each of whom holds great relevance for the modern world.

	...Later during the 1930s, after he was done campaigning on behalf of expelled Jewish scientists and saw visions of neutrons branching out and releasing prodigious amounts of energy, Szilard performed some of the earliest experiments in the United States demonstrating fission. And while he famously disdained getting his hands dirty, he played a key role in helping Enrico Fermi set up the world's first nuclear reactor.


"campaigning on behalf of expelled Jewish scientists"--which ones?


	...he helped the former technically savvy patent clerk put his knowledge of engineering to good use (as another indication of how underappreciated Szilard remains, the Wikipedia entry on the device is called the "Einstein refrigerator"). 


goes with "genius behind the shadows" monicker. hadn't heard of this guy before


	...He also excelled at what we today called networking; his networking skills were on full display for instance when he secured rare, impurity-free graphite from a commercial supplier as a moderator in Fermi's nuclear reactor; in fact the failure of German scientists to secure such pure graphite and the subsequent inability of the contaminated graphite to sustain fission damaged their belief in the viability of a chain reaction and held them back. Szilard's networking abilities were also evident in his connections with prominent financiers and bankers who he constantly tried to conscript in supporting his scientific and political adventures; in attaining his goals he would not hesitate to write any letter, ring any doorbell, ask for any amount of money, travel to any land and generally try to use all means at his disposal to secure support from the right authorities. In his case the "right authorities" ranged, at various times in his life, from top scientists to bankers to a Secretary of State (James Byrnes), a President of the United States (FDR) and a Premier of the Soviet Union (Nikita Khrushchev).


why was he so good at "networking"?


	...If Szilard had accomplished his scientific milestones and nothing more he would already have been a notable name in twentieth century science. But more than almost any other scientist of his time Szilard was also imbued with an intense desire to engage himself politically - "save the world" as he put it - from an early age. Among other scientists of his time, only Niels Bohr probably came closest to exhibiting the same kind of genuine and passionate concern for the social consequences of science that Szilard did. This was Leo Szilard the political activist. Even in his teens, when the Great War had not even broken out, he could see how the geopolitical landscape of Europe would change, how Russia would "lose" even if it won the war. When Hitler came to power in 1933 and others were not yet taking him seriously Szilard was one of the few scientists who foresaw the horrific legacy that this madman would bequeath Europe. This realization was what prompted him to help Jewish scientists find jobs in the UK, at about the same time that he also had his prophetic vision at the traffic light.


"prophetic vision", predicted Hitler and that revolution would destroy Russia?


	It was during the war that Szilard's striking role as conscientious political advocate became clear. He famously alerted Einstein to the implications of fission - at this point in time (July 1939) Szilard and his fellow Hungarian expatriates were probably the only scientists who clearly saw the danger - and helped Einstein draft the now iconic letter to President Roosevelt.


now this is saying he "helped him draft" it. Did he help him draft it or did he write it?


	Einstein's name remains attached to the letter, Szilard's is often sidelined; a recent article about the letter from the Institute for Advanced study on my Facebook mentioned the former but not the latter. 


"in the shadows" again


	...In the process he drove Manhattan Project security up the wall through his rejection of compartmentalization; throughout his life Szilard had been - in the words of the biologist Jacques Monod - "as generous with his ideas as a Maori chief with his wives" and he favored open and honest scientific inquiry. At one point General Groves who was the head of the project even wrote a letter to Secretary of War Henry Stimson asking the secretary to consider incarcerating Szilard; Stimson who was a wise and humane man - he later took ancient and sacred Kyoto off Groves's atomic bomb target list - refused.


there's something wrong with this author


	Szilard's day in the sun came when he circulated a petition directed toward the president and signed by 70 scientists advocating a demonstration of the bomb to the Japanese and an attempt at cooperation in the field of atomic energy with the Soviets. This was activist Leo Szilard at his best. Groves was livid, Oppenheimer - who by now had tasted power and was an establishment man - was deeply hesitant and the petition was stashed away in a safe until after the war.


is that an accurate characterization? of the event, don't know, but hard to say Oppenheimer "by now an establishment man" when he's risking his career to oppose the h-bomb


	...In 1949 he wrote a remarkable fictitious story titled 'My Trial As A War Criminal' in which he imagined what would have happened had the United States lost the war to the Soviets; Szilard's point was that in participating in the creation of nuclear weapons, American scientists were no less or more complicit than their Russian counterparts.


isn't this their favorite thing to say, for anything they do?

not really for U.S. v "Russian," but for their org and everyone else


	...After playing a key role in the founding of the Salk Institute in California, Szilard died peacefully in his sleep in 1964, hoping that the genie whose face he had seen at the traffic light in 1933 would treat human beings with kindness.


weird

a little creepy, for both Szilard and author


	...Since Szilard the common and deep roots that underlie the tree of science and politics have become far clearer. Today we need scientists like Szilard to stand up for science every time a scientific issue such as climate change or evolution collides with politics. When Szilard pushed scientists to get involved in politics it may have looked like an anomaly, but today we are struggling with very similar issues.


I think the author is calling for more politicizing global warming?


	...Whether he was balancing thermodynamic thoughts with refrigeration concerns or following up political idealism with letters to prominent politicians, he taught us all how to both think and do. As interdisciplinary scientist, as astute technological inventor, as conscientious political activist, as a troublemaker of the best kind, Leo Szilard leaves us with an outstanding role model and an enduring legacy. It is up to us to fill his shoes.


also by ashutosh Jogalekar:


https://blogs.scientificamerican.com/the-curious-wavefunction/gavrilo-princip-conspiracy-theories-and-the-fragility-of-cause-and-effect/
	Gavrilo Princip, conspiracy theories and the fragility of cause and effect

	A hundred years ago this day in Sarajevo, disgruntled nationalist Gavrilo Princip fired a shot. An Archduke and his wife died, the world mourned and fulminated, and in a rash of misunderstanding and patriotic throes the nations of Europe went to war with each other, a war that in its calculated butchery exceeded all that [...]

	    By Ashutosh Jogalekar on June 28, 2014



has a weird, condescending writing style


	...When you read the story of the shots that led to World War 1, what strikes you is how staggering the gulf between cause and effect was, how little it takes for history to change, how utterly subject to accidental and unlikely events the fickle fortunes of men are. Reading the story of Princip and the Archduke, one sometimes gets the feeling of being no more than wood chips being cast adrift on the roaring river of history.

	...Since the Archduke had just expressed outrage at an attempted assassination, he should have known better than to drive back the same way he came. However it seems that only one of the generals in his entourage suggested taking an alternative route back. But in the heat of the moment, for some reason this timely advice was not communicated to the driver who decided to again drive back through the city center. While this was happening Princip had purportedly given up and was hanging around a bakery, maybe enjoying a pastry. However when he saw the car return on the same route the opportunity was too good to pass; more so since the transmission seemed to be jammed and the driver could not back up. The rest is very much history.


he sounds like he knows the Okhrana had it out for Ferdinand, he thinks nobody else knows this and he's jerking off to this


	Even after Princip's arrest World War 1 was not foreordained. Nothing is. But as Barbara Tuchman recounts in her marvelous book "The Guns of August", an almost surreal comedy of errors and a mountain of human stupidity on the part of Europe's leaders and diplomats followed the Archduke's murder and led to the Great War. But part of Shermer's motive in recounting Princip's story is to illustrate the absurdity of most conspiracy theories. A lot of conspiracy theorists, including those who deny climate change or evolution, try to convince everyone of some grand machinations going on in the highest reaches of government/industry/secret syndicates that lead to reality being either hidden from the public or being shamelessly manipulated for nefarious ends. But Princip's story tells us how messy reality is; the assassination almost failed, and at every turn its success or failure depended on events that ultimately were a function as much of chance as anything else. 


but that's not how modern espionage works

why would they have a ridiculous amount of agents, even the driver of Ferdinand's car? to handle uncertainty when it happens

I think it's been said that their thinking for e.g. scouting in universities is that they don't know who will rise to high-level positions in gov, but might as well recruit as many as they can in case someone does. (this was in FBI report iirc) So it's a numbers game to beat chance.


	...But the murder of the Archduke provides us with another valuable window into the fickle nature of history and the minds of conspiracy theorists. This window illuminates the fact that staggeringly important events can result from trivial causes. Even a relative nobody like Gavrilo Princip or Lee Harvey Oswald can change history because of the unpredictable effects of chance and circumstance. But the problem is that the human mind being what is, it looks for causal patterns that are as large as the effects they produce. We find it easy to accept the incalculably evil Nazis as the cause of World War 2 but find it hard to swallow the lowly Princip as the pivotal cause of World War 1. We find it even harder to accept the inconsequential Lee Harvey Oswald as the causal factor for the murder of the consequential John F Kennedy. In the face of disparate differences between cause and effect our mind resorts to what Shermer calls “patternicity” and “agenticity”. Since we believe that the agents responsible for historic effects should be as major as the events themselves, we start conjuring them up to soothe our psychology. 


I think I get what he's saying

it's entirely possible for a madman to go and shoot a president on his own, you can't assume a conspiracy just based on that fact alone

I think the reason to suspect a conspiracy are when a lot of things happen that are unusual and compound to preclude conicidence. Like in JFK case a police officer shot oswald and didn't get charged for it, a whole lot of intrigue happened around Oswald's connections to CIA and Soviets, and there were a lot of intrigues that looked like set-ups to pin assassination plots on JFK (assassination attempts of Castro and assassination of Deim). The very fact that there is a campaign to spread conspiracies around the assassination (and patterns thereof) is a reason to be suspicious.

I don't completely get what he's saying though

is he saying Princip was the cause of WWI?


	It is this inability to grasp the disparities between cause and effect that leads to some of the most prominent conspiracy theories involving science, including climate change and evolution denial. For instance, consider some of the questions that both camps raise when confronted with the evidence: How can puny humans cause the global climate to change? How can “microevolution” be responsible for “macroevolution”? How can minor policies that we undertake today be useful for ameliorating the untoward influences of climate change tomorrow? Even when the mountain of evidence is monumental, conspiracy theorists will try to discredit the entire edifice based on tiny details. Transitional fossils? Too sparse to say anything about evolution. Melting of ice sheets? Too inconsequential to say anything about global climate change. Bacterial change (as demonstrated massively through the patient experiments of Richard Lenski)? Too minor to account for change in higher animals. Conspiracy theorists either cannot accept or actively deny the role of simple details in the larger picture, although the former trait is definitely widespread.


seems like he gets the arguments of conspiracy theorists, some of these can be seen on fake news sites


	...Today as we contemplate Princip’s actions and the rupturing of world affairs that followed, it is wise to also contemplate this web of interconnections and to use it as a bulwark against those who would deny its implications and instead try to foist their own deterministic prejudices upon its gossamer threads. As the old proverb goes, we now know and can even rationalize how for want of a horseshoe an entire kingdom can be lost. Whether we find this fact fascinating or heartbreaking, we need to accept it as a fact at the heart of reality itself.


dude's writing poetry about his theory that WWI was started by chance and he hasn't even read up on it


https://blogs.scientificamerican.com/the-curious-wavefunction/why-the-world-needs-more-leo-szilards/
	Without Szilard the bomb would have certainly been built, but the letter may never have been written and the beginnings of fission research in the US may have been delayed. 


does he even believe what he was saying? why is a science guy writing about WWI anyway?


https://blogs.scientificamerican.com/the-curious-wavefunction/oppenheimer-8217-s-folly-on-black-holes-fundamental-laws-and-pure-and-applied-science/
	Oppenheimer’s folly: On black holes, fundamental laws and pure and applied science

	On September 1, 1939, the same day that Germany attacked Poland and started World War 2, a remarkable paper appeared in the pages of the journal Physical Review.

	    By Ashutosh Jogalekar on June 26, 2014


	...He had not worked on black holes before 1938, and he would not do so ever again. Ironically, it is this brief contribution to physics that is now widely considered to be Oppenheimer’s greatest, enough to have possibly warranted him a Nobel Prize had he lived long enough to see experimental evidence for black holes show up with the advent of radio astronomy.


points out might have got nobel prize if he lived longer


	What happened? Manhattan Project a few years later and got busy with building the atomic bomb. It also wasn't because he despised the free-thinking and eccentric Zwicky who had laid the foundations for the field through the discovery of black holes' parents - neutron stars. It wasn’t even because he achieved celebrity status after the war, became the most powerful scientist in the country and spent an inordinate amount of time consulting in Washington until his carefully orchestrated downfall in 1954. All these factors contributed, but the real reason was something else entirely – Oppenheimer just wasn’t interested in black holes. Even after his downfall, when he had plenty of time to devote to physics, he never talked or wrote about them. The creator of black holes basically did not think they mattered.


author points out Oppenheimer despised a free-thinking scientist, became celebrity from manhattan project, "spent inordinate time in Washington consulting" before "carefully orechestrated downfall"

maybe interesting things about Oppenheimer, but tangentially related at best?

sound like he doesn't like Oppenheimer


	Oppenheimer’s rejection of one of the most fascinating implications of modern physics and one of the most enigmatic objects in the universe - and one he sired - is documented well by Freeman Dyson who tried to initiate conversations about the topic with him. Every time Dyson brought it up Oppenheimer would change the subject, almost as if he had disowned his own scientific children.

	The reason, as attested to by Dyson and others who knew him, was that in his last few decades Oppenheimer was stricken by a disease which I call “fundamentalitis”. Fundamentalitis is a serious condition that causes its victims to believe that the only thing worth thinking about is the deep nature of reality as manifested through the fundamental laws of physics.

	As Dyson put it:

    	“Oppenheimer in his later years believed that the only problem worthy of the attention of a serious theoretical physicist was the discovery of the fundamental equations of physics. Einstein certainly felt the same way. To discover the right equations was all that mattered. Once you had discovered the right equations, then the study of particular solutions of the equations would be a routine exercise for second-rate physicists or graduate students.”

    Thus for Oppenheimer, black holes, which were particular solutions of general relativity, were mundane; the general theory itself was the real deal. 


wasn't he right?


	In addition they were anomalies, ugly exceptions which were best ignored rather than studied. As Dyson mentions, unfortunately Oppenheimer was not the only one affected by this condition. Einstein, who spent his last few years in a futile search for a grand unified theory, was another. Like Oppenheimer he was uninterested in black holes, but he also went a step further by not believing in quantum mechanics. Einstein’s fundamentalitis was quite pathological indeed.


this is weird

discovering fundamental laws of nature would be huge

any time laws are discovered, Newton's laws, Quantum mechanics, Relativity, benefits are huge. Wouldn't have satellites, computers, all sorts of things without them. I think this is obvious?

the reason to do experiments is to find the laws, for anyone who cares about that and every theoretical physicist would


	...Einstein and Oppenheimer could scarcely have imagined that this cornucopia of discoveries would come from an entity that they despised. But their wariness toward black holes is not only an example of missed opportunities or the fact that great minds can sometimes suffer from tunnel vision. I think the biggest lesson from the story of Oppenheimer and black holes is that what is considered ‘applied’ science can actually turn out to harbor deep fundamental mysteries. 


does author actually think he's smarter than Einstein?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Photoelectric_effect
	In 1905, Einstein proposed an explanation of the photoelectric effect using a concept first put forward by Max Planck that light waves consist of tiny bundles or packets of energy known as photons or quanta.


pretty sure Einstein would have got that concept, and this is basic science history. Author is supposed to be a science historian...

I'm sorry but this guy pisses me off

does he do this on purpose?

it's the smugness and condescending tone I guess

would pin him as a narcissistic sociopath



https://blogs.scientificamerican.com/the-curious-wavefunction/oppenheimer-8217-s-folly-on-black-holes-fundamental-laws-and-pure-and-applied-science/
	Both Oppenheimer and Einstein considered the study of black holes to be too applied, an examination of anomalies and specific solutions unworthy of thinkers thinking deep thoughts about the cosmos. But the delicious irony was that black holes in fact contained some of the deepest mysteries of the cosmos, forging unexpected connections between disparate disciplines and challenging the finest minds in the field. If only Oppenheimer and Einstein had been more open-minded.

	...Today many physicists are again engaged in a search for ultimate laws, with at least some of them thinking that these ultimate laws would be found within the framework of string theory. These physicists probably regard other parts of physics, and especially the applied ones, as unworthy of their great theoretical talents. For these physicists the story of Oppenheimer and black holes should serve as a cautionary tale. 

	...As Einstein might have said had he known better, the distinction between the pure and the applied is often only a "stubbornly persistent illusion". It's an illusion that we must try hard to dispel.


something wrong with this guy


the topics he chooses to write about and the bias he shows point to something being up with him, like he's one of the agentura

but he comes off as too weak-minded and arrogant--would you really trust this guy with important secrets?


...


https://blogs.scientificamerican.com/the-curious-wavefunction/genes-and-race-the-distant-footfalls-of-evidence/
	Genes and Race: The Distant Footfalls of Evidence

	A review of Nicholas Wade’s book, “A Troublesome Inheritance: Genes, Race and Human History“. In this book NYT science writer Nicholas Wade advances two simple premises: firstly, that we should stop looking only toward culture as a determinant of differences between populations and individuals, and secondly, that those who claim that race is only a [...]

	    By Ashutosh Jogalekar on May 13, 2014


kindof reminds me of David Warmflash


maybe he's an experiment?

they have different ideologies they feed to different people, right?

like Oppenheimer and others were opposed to secrecy and thought they should give Soviets the bomb to help defeat the Nazis, Russian agents thought they were helping their country, Fermi and Szilard apparently thought something different...


to guess way out there: maybe these guys are for biological warfare?

like find a way to convince scientists to be elitist and racist

and that's how you could convince someone to deliberately start e.g. the ebola epidemic, which had some intrigues around it and Warmflash commented on it in a creepy way.

They were able to convince Nazis to commit genocide, but how are they going to get people to commit genocide today?


...


https://blogs.scientificamerican.com/the-curious-wavefunction/why-prejudice-alone-doesnt-explain-the-gender-gap-in-science/
	Why Prejudice Alone Doesn't Explain the Gender Gap in Science

	 This is a guest post from my friend Chris Martin. Chris (chriscmartin.com) studied psychology and music at Davidson College, human-computer interaction at Georgia Tech, and psychology at the College of William and Mary.

	    By Ashutosh Jogalekar on April 22, 2014


Jogalekar hitting all angles

fawningly quotes Larry Summers on this too!

with Warmflash and Jogalekar could tell with both something wrong with them, and it's like they don't realize it when they write

even still, Warmflash looked like he was handling important things with Phobos grunt, so it's not like they're just "human bullets" in waiting (e.g. like crazy people they'll use for shootings or terrorist attacks).

With Warmflash there were also some hints that he was deliberately misleading and doing active measures (the pro-GMO stuff, article on colonizing venus), and since he pretty much always sounded crazy it wasn't easy to tell

Does Jogalekar believe what he's saying in this article?

could be honest narcissist, which naturally pisses people off, or could be a troll realizing that an efficient way to piss people off is to act like a narcissist (or a little of both)

even if he honestly believes it, it could be the intent of his "handler" who whoever if anyone wanted to give him these ideas to use him to piss people off as part of active measures.


remember for article on Leo Szilard, it came off that Jogalekar knew something was going on with Szilard and I guess approved of it. So point here is if here were just a tool to piss people off why would he have inside knowledge that would be really devestating if leaked?

hard to pin him and Warmflash down

it's like both are evil people with history-altering secret knowledge, but at the same time both are incompetent


https://blogs.scientificamerican.com/the-curious-wavefunction/the-many-tragedies-of-edward-teller/

article by Jogalekar on E Teller, should read when figuring out waht was going on with Teller


http://vodafrauds.blogspot.com/2014/
	Genes and Race: The Distant Footfalls of Evidence:  A review of Nicholas Wade’s book, “A Troublesome Inheritance: Genes, Race and Human History“.

	Despite the great care the author below took not to tread on any toes, waves of shrieks emanated from the always irrational Left in response to it.  As a result SciAm issued an apology for publishing it.  The author, Ashutosh Jogalekar,  was eventually fired over it. 


some blog says Jogalekar was fired over his review of racist book, but not sure how reliable this is



http://www.lindau-nobel.org/infections-and-disease-the-golden-age/
	Infections and Disease: The Golden Age?
	Posted on 30/06/2010 by Ashutosh Jogalekar


weird article all the way through


	...One very interesting hypothesis is that amyloid is a defense against infection. I find this idea to be very provocative, and I have penned a post a while back on how amyloid might aid the body in the fight against bacterial infection. I wouldn’t want to plug in my own ideas here, but to summarize, I think that amyloid may have fought against bacteria by binding to metal ions like copper and iron and generating free radicals.


pretty sure he's just like this, there would be no point to this for active measures

the guy is probably a mental case

assuming he's recruited, what would they want to recruit him for?

Warmflash isn't as bad as him


this is interesting:


https://blogs.scientificamerican.com/the-curious-wavefunction/richard-feynman-sexism-and-changing-perceptions-of-a-scientific-icon/
	Note from Blogs Editor Curtis Brainard: On Saturday, July 12 the text of this post was replaced with the following statement: "The text of this post has been removed because it did not meet Scientific American's quality standards."

	To be specific, we felt that the post lacked clarity in a manner similar to two previous posts published by this author (please see, "A Response to Recent Criticism"). As the author acknowledged in an addendum to the post before it was removed, he did not effectively convey the points he was trying to make. We believe the lack of clarity made the post insensitive to valid concerns that many readers have about past and existing biases and prejudices in our society.

	However, this alone is not necessarily enough to warrant removal. Another serious issue underlying the post was that following the earlier rounds of criticism of his work, the author and I had come to an agreement about steps that he would take to prevent future misunderstandings. The author, however, failed to take those steps when producing this post, which caused us to take down the post and remove the author from the blog network.


guy really does suck and his bosses have taken notice?


it made WaPo!

https://www.washingtonpost.com/lifestyle/style/whats-going-on-at-scientific-american-deleted-posts-sexism-claims-a-fired-writer/2014/07/16/46526b52-0d20-11e4-8c9a-923ecc0c7d23_story.html?utm_term=.96230343c7da
	 What’s going on at Scientific American? Deleted posts, sexism claims, a fired writer. 


	...Lately, however, things have become kind of a mess.

	A series of blog posts on the magazine’s Web site over the past few months has unleashed waves of criticism and claims that the publication was promoting racism, sexism and “genetic determinism.” 


	...The trouble started in April when a guest blogger, a doctoral student named Chris Martin, wrote about Lawrence H. Summers’ assertions when he was president of Harvard University about the paucity of women in some scientific fields. While acknowledging that discrimination played a role in holding back women, Martin also concluded, “the latest research suggests that discrimination has a weaker impact than people might think, and that innate sex differences explain quite a lot.”


	...The second land mine was a post in May by Ashutosh Jogalekar, which favorably reviewed a controversial book by Nicholas Wade, “A Troublesome Inheritance: Genes, Race and Human History.” Jogalekar praised the book, saying it confirms the need to “recognize a strong genetic component to [social and cognitive] differences” among racial groups.


active measures or did they really just decide this guy sucks? (or both?)

Entine and Warmflash got away with similar, although writing for their own weird project and not scientific American

I think saw references to Jogelakar and fake news sites and stormfront, so could be popularizing these ideas too (here's one: http://www.science20.com/cool-links/ashutosh_jogalekar_is_what_happens_under_corporate_thought_control-140720)


say he is agentura

at the same time is excessively narcasistic, maybe unstable

they give him all sorts of secret knowledge that would be a huge problem if leaked

then he screws up and embarasses everyone and they fire him

how do you fire someone like that?


...


https://www.quora.com/What-was-Robert-Oppenheimer-like-as-a-person
	Ashutosh Jogalekar, I have ten years of experience writing about the history of physics, most recently on Scientific American B...
	Answered Sep 24, 2014
	Brilliant, charismatic, arrogant, often mesmerizing, possessing a mind of dazzling catholicity that was as much at home with Sanskrit and 17th century French poetry as with theoretical physics. People who knew him usually fell into two camps; those who idolized his intellect (the majority) and those who saw him as a pretentious poseur. He had the quickest mind that anyone had ever come across but could also be cruel and hurtful in his words and interactions. Women usually loved him; men he could awe or antagonize. This polarizing and paradoxical set of qualities was responsible for both his preeminent rise and subsequent downfall.


https://www.quora.com/Why-didnt-J-Robert-Oppenheimer-win-a-Nobel-Prize-in-Physics?share=1
	Oppenheimer might have won a Nobel Prize had he lived long enough to see his predictions of black holes experimentally verified. Aside from this contribution, it's hard to see what he could have won the prize for though; he was a brilliant scientist, but he never quite achieved the kind of unique, transformative success achieved by physicists like Heisenberg, Schrodinger and Dirac. Part of the reason was that his interests and attention kept on shifting from one topic to another.


comes off as balanced on Oppenheimer


...


https://blogs.scientificamerican.com/the-curious-wavefunction/why-the-poor-lack-mental-capacity-and-why-they-need-help/
	Why the poor lack mental capacity, and why they need help

	Throughout the world, the poor face increasingly gruelling choices; whether to save for retirement or to send a kid to college, whether to buy that used car for basic transportation needs or to buy educational material for their children.

	    By Ashutosh Jogalekar on September 4, 2013


    ...A recent study from Harvard, Princeton, British Columbia and Warwick published in Science suggests that while the poor may already be suffering from the difficulty of making tough economic choices, they may in fact be facing a double whammy in the form of having insufficient cognitive capability and self-control to make these choices.


    ...As the abstract and introduction make it clear, poverty already tracks with poor decision outcomes; everything from compliance with medication routines to filling out forms on time:

    	A variety of studies point to a correlation between poverty and counterproductive behavior. The poor use less preventive health care (1), fail to adhere to drug regimens (2), are tardier and less likely to keep appointments (3, 4), are less productive workers (5), less attentive parents (6), and worse managers of their finances (7–9). These behaviors are troubling in their own right, but they are particularly troubling because they can further deepen poverty.

	What factors could be responsible for this behavior? External economic and social factors certainly play a role, but the study instead proposes that a diminishing of mental capacity might be disproportionately responsible. 

    ...The conclusion of the study is simple; due to their circumstances, the poor are simply less focused, more mentally exhausted, more lacking in self-control and less able to make decisions abetting their well-being. They need help.


I guess he's trying to use science to say poor people are dumb

why?

the pattern for both him and Warmflash was elitism

all the weird or offensive things they espoused could be used to argue for elitism in one form or another

maybe could also call it bigotry

like you could say Nazis were "elitist" because they thought Jews were inferior to them and they were "chosen race"

the reason this is concerning is that elitism, in whatever form it takes, is probably a necessary step for convincing somneone to kill people en mass




------



http://www.nybooks.com/articles/1994/09/22/were-the-atom-scientists-spies-an-exchange/


odd things with Sudoplatov's account


	...This is unfortunate, because misleading. The Schecters’ book, based on conversations with the retired Russian intelligence officer Pavel Sudoplatov, claims that four leading scientists associated with the American Manhattan Project—J. Robert Oppenheimer, Enrico Fermi, Leo Szilard, and Niels Bohr—were atomic spies for the Russians. Two months of vigorous public debate of these claims have refuted them in substance and detail, and I do not know of a single historian who now takes them seriously.



they started a debate

this was in 1994...

there might be useful information or leads in Schecter's book and Sudoplatov's account, although so far sounds like at least part of it is misinformation


the reply to Schecters mostly tries to refute them on Oppenheimer, then on Bohr 


also guy doing reply John Cairncross was a soviet double agent...


died a year after writing this


------


http://blog.nuclearsecrecy.com/2012/06/18/what-if-truman-didnt-order-h-bomb-crash-program/
	What If Truman Hadn’t Ordered the H-bomb Crash Program?

	The debate over the hydrogen bomb is one of my favorite Cold War episodes. I keep coming back to it, both on the blog and in my research. I’d posit that it is in many ways a lot more interesting than the debates about Hiroshima and Nagasaki. Why? Because at the time of the Second World War, there was actually very little debate about Hiroshima and Nagasaki. You basically had the Franck Report and the Targeting Committee; the former said, “don’t drop it,” and the latter replied, “who cares what you think? We’re dropping it.” As many have pointed out, the whole idea that there was a conscious “decision to drop the atomic bomb” is a bit off — it doesn’t appear that anybody who had the authority to drop the bomb agonized over the question before dropping it. What agonizing there was mostly came after the fact.

	The H-bomb was something else, though. This was a technical possibility that had been seen long before the weapon was capable of being built, and there actually was a period of serious behind-the-scenes and later public debate over whether it should be built, in an era where the potential guilt of Hiroshima and Nagasaki was still palpable. A lot of scientists saw the hydrogen bomb as an opportunity for the moral debate they never had about the atomic bomb, and that makes it, to me, a much more interesting co-mingling of visions of the past and fears of the future.

	The ultimate “What If?“ of the atomic bomb is, “what if they didn’t drop the bomb?” The ultimate “What If?” of the H-bomb is, what if Truman hadn’t ordered the crash program in late January 1950? 

	The common Cold War argument was one of technological inevitability: if the H-bomb could be built, it would be built. This was then mixed with an existential plea: it would have been “intolerable” for the USSR to have an H-bomb and the USA not to.


If it weren't for WWII, would the a-bomb have ever been built? if it weren't for the cold war, would they H-bomb have been built?


	...In this timeline, we use the “real world” Soviet testing timeline with the “most probable” US reaction timeline. The result is that the Soviets have their first H-bomb at just about the same time that the US would have had one. That is, even in the worst-case scenario, the US and the USSR more or less have multi-megaton H-bombs at the same time. Not much imbalance to be held, especially if you take it into account that the US still had a huge advantage in fission weapons (3057 to 200 in 1955) and deliverability (bases in close proximity, long-range bombers).

	All of these scenarios, of course, presume that the USSR would have soldiered on ahead with the H-bomb even if the US had renounced building it. That is, these are by definition all pessimistic scenarios — and none of them are that bad. One wonders what truly optimistic scenarios would have looked like!

	...I’m more or less convinced that the world wouldn’t have ended if Truman hadn’t ordered the H-bomb’s development. Heck, even if the USSR did have exclusive possession of multi-megaton H-bombs, I still don’t see it affecting the strategic situation in a completely “intolerable” way — I don’t see the USA ever thinking its fission deterrent wasn’t able to deter. But the beauty of this way of thinking about it is that you don’t even have to have that discussion, really, because it’s not clear that possibility was ever on the table.


author argues "wee need H-Bomb now before Soviets" idea wasn't based on reality

seems like Truman ordered the H-Bomb crash program for bad reasons. How did that happen?


FBI guy "Nathan D. Parks" wrote: "H-bomb Develppment: Decision on the Merits or Political Ncessity?"


http://www.dtic.mil/dtic/tr/fulltext/u2/1009775.pdf

pg 34

	...The proposals the AEC offered primarily concerned accelerating production of atomic weapons, but within weeks the secret debate over how to respond came to revolve around a single fundamental question: should the United States adopt a “crash” program to develop a thermonuclear bomb?


pg 36


Oppenehimer headed GAC, with had influential Manhattan project scientists in it

JCAE in Congress was "probably the most powerful Congressional committee in the history of the nation." They were for more aggressive nuke development

all of this was prompted by the Soviets detonation of an atomic bomb

pg 41

Strauss was for developing super, and met with Soueres who met with President regularly to tell him of possibility of h-bomb. Souers encouraged Strauss to write Truman who said he hadn't heard of possibility of h-bomb before.

pg 41

Lawrence believed scientists should defer to politicians

pg 42

	In a 21 October letter to fellow GAC member James Conant, Oppenheimer discussed at some length the influence he believed the scientists were exerting. He stated in part, “two experienced promoters have been at work, i.e., Ernest Lawrence and Edward Teller. The project has long been dear to Teller’s heart; and Ernest has convinced himself that...the Russians will soon do the super, and that we had better beat them to it... Ernest spoke to [Senator and JCAE member William] Knowland and McMahon, and to some at least of the Joint Chiefs.” Oppenheimer continued in the letter to contend that Lawrence and Teller’s involvement was responsible for the JCAE’s and Joint Chiefs’ interest in supporting development, as well as for changing “[t]he climate of opinion among other respected scientists.”91 While Oppenheimer may have overstated the influence of the pro-Super scientists, they undoubtedly played a significant role in dampening the influence of the GAC scientists by advocating for the new weapon with policy and offering a credible alternative assessment of its prospects and value. Interestingly, York pointed out that Lilienthal later made no mention of Teller’s involvement in the debate, focusing exclusively on Lawrence and Alvarez as the leaders of the scientific push for development.


pg 43

Alvarez and Latimer met with McMahon and Hinshaw in JCAE, I Rabi, and JCS to pitch building super "before the Russians did."

in his diary Avlez says got universal support except by Lilienthal who he says was disgusted

pg 44

more Lawrence lobbying for super

pg 45

AEC agreed to Strauss reccoendation to refer h-bomb question to GAC. Didn't confine to Strauss question of "how to build it," also added "should we built it"

after some meetings, "all the GAC member strongly opposed the rapid development of thermonuclear weapons."


	...The GAC was not unanimous in its specific recommendations, but it was on the major points: a desire to avoid development of the weapon, reluctance to see the United States initiate such development, and that an all-out development effort would be wrong at that time. Two annexes were attached to the main report clarifying the arguments of the various members, which differed primarily on whether to foreswear development unilaterally or only if the Soviet Union agreed to a mutual moratorium.


pg 47


	... As Anne Fitzpatrick noted, this was not the first time the GAC had advised against an immediate program on the Super based on technical grounds – it had also done so in June 1948.100 However, the moral and policy concerns that undergirded the Committee’s October 1949 recommendation marked a significant deviation from its mandate to provide technical expertise. There was also a contradiction unnoticed at the time between existing AEC policy, which had proceeded with slow but methodical development toward the H-bomb since the end of World War II, and the latest GAC recommendations opposing development, indicating that moral concerns were ignored or deferred until the matter became imminent.101 While it is counterfactual, it is likely that the GAC’s opposition to a “crash course” development program would have carried far more weight with policy makers had its arguments remained focused on the technical uncertainty and resource allocation risks, as those assessments were clearly within the professional purview of the committee and its members. However, because the GAC moved the debate from whether to continue the slow and steady development plan or significantly accelerate the effort to one of either no development or rapid development, maintaining the status quo was replaced as a policy option by unilateral renunciation.


the GAC's moral reccomendation was not a part of its mandate. Moral concerns weren't brought up before then. Author posits that the GAC's opposition to super would have carried more weight with policy makers if they stayed focus on technical grounds, since this was in their purview. GAC shifted it from whether or not to do a crash program or status quo (slow dev) to question of "unilateral renunciation."

did this weigh on Truman's decision? others? Truman called Oppenheimer a crybaby for opposing atomic bombs, and I guess thought nukes were manly. Fermi's "minority report" was much more emphatic on moral concerns, compared it to "genocide," and sounds like something Truman could be inclined to categorize as whining from crybaby scientists.


	The AEC received the GAC’s report immediately and discussed it the following day with McMahon. McMahon was vehemently opposed to the GAC’s recommendations about the Super and Lilienthal was left with the impression that McMahon saw war with the USSR as inevitable and the Super as the United States’ only defense. McMahon advised the Commissioners that he was writing to President Truman to request an opportunity to be heard if Truman was inclined to accept the GAC’s recommendation.102 Two days later Teller arrived in Washington to meet with McMahon. At their meeting McMahon said the GAC report “made him sick.” A few days later McMahon left Washington to visit the AEC’s western facilities on his own fact-finding tour.


McMahon reacted strongly to the GAC report and gave impression h-bombs were America's only defense agaisnst Soviets (is this origin of charges that Oppenheimer's opposition to H-Bomb was a Soviet plot?). McCahon decided to ask Truman about GAC reccomendation. McMahon pow-woed with teller and trashed GAC report for "making him sick." McMahon went on quest to AEC.


	The same week the AEC Commissioners were wrestling with the GAC report. After two days of meetings they were firmly divided, with Dean joining Strauss in advocating development while Pike and Smyth joined Lilienthal in general opposition. The Commissioners decided to meet with as many of the GAC members as were available the following Monday to see if they could reach consensus. The meeting disappointed both sides and got them no closer to agreement. Lilienthal, in a hurry to get a recommendation to the President before pressure from the scientists and JCAE constrained his options, drafted a report with split recommendations. It laid out a number of technical points that both sides agreed on including: that there was a better than even chance the Super could be developed but it would take a minimum of three years; that it wouldhave unlimited power; that the general principles of the reaction were well known to the Russians; to match a concerted Soviet effort would require immediate and vigorous action; that action would disrupt existing projects and it could not be kept secret. The report advised of the differences among the Commissioners, and attached the GAC report as well as individual views from the three Commissioners who were in Washington at the time. Lilienthal delivered the report to President Truman on 9 November.


AEC was "firmly divided" on GAC report. Decided to meet with GAC but made no progress. Lilienthal rushed to write a report to Truman on agreements and differences with GAC report attached and "views from the three Commissions who were in Washington at the time" (who were those?) Sent 9 Nov 1949.

pg 48

	With McMahon encouragement, Strauss wrote "strong letter" to Truman in support of super, alarmist about Russian development and trashing plans for agreements or international control


pg 49

AEC expressed concern over pressure on Truman. They said the public debate would get ugly and WH needed to assume control, so there was "a necessity for an early decision of policy by the President"


	...From these statements, agreed to by all five Commissioners, it is apparent that the AEC already perceived that the President’s options were severely constrained and that a delay in the White House assuming active control of the debate would be costly. Rhodes noted that in retrospect what President Truman learned from the fall debate was the political urgency of announcing a decision, not new information to shape the decision, since Truman had probably already made his choice.


pg 50


Truman's respons wasn't public and didn't decide the debate. Appointing committee of Lilienthal, Acheson, and Johnson in NSC to advise him and "analyze all phases of the question." Said sicussion should be conducted with as little publicity as possible.


	...However, in the days after President Truman appointed the Special Committee additional pressure started to pile up on the White House. On 1 November, Senator Edwin Johnson from Colorado, a member of the JCAE, mentioned the Super on television while condemning scientists for security leaks. That mistake apparently went unnoticed until the Washington Post ran a feature article about the subject the same day Truman established the Special Committee, threatening to spill the debate into the public domain.109 Three days later McMahon sent a long and very detailed refutation of the GAC’s position to President Truman. In it he attacked the foundations on which the GAC built its opposition, addressing in excruciating detail the GAC arguments about the immorality of the Super, its lack of military value, and the suggestion that an agreement with the USSR could prevent development. In case the President had any doubt about McMahon’s position, it was clarified when McMahon stated, “any other decision would almost guarantee disaster for our nation...if we let Russia get the Super first, catastrophe becomes all but certain – whereas, if get it first, there exists a chance of saving ourselves.”1


Congress and WaPo immediately made it public and McMahon sent another letter refuting GAC report and "we need to have h-bomb before Russia"

	
	McMahon’s letter, running seven single spaced pages, served as a reasonable proxy for both the JCAE’s position and level of interest, as well as the de facto position of the whole Congress. Records indicate that McMahon, serving as Chairman of the JCAE, was the only legislator directly engaged with the White House on the topic of thermonuclear weapons. Thus, in a situation very unusual for the legislative branch, its arguments came from a single unified position. Moreover, the arguments McMahon advanced were well-synchronized with Strauss’s letter, which reached President Truman on 25 November, and would soon be found consistent with those of Johnson and the Joint Chiefs. Thus, President Truman was presented with intense advocacy in favor of development from an AEC Commissioner, Congress, and the National Military Establishment in less than a one week span.


Truman was getting a lot of political pressure to build super

pg 52

JCS also stronlgy supported development in more measured tone

GAC met again 2-3 December and reaffirmed position, adding it would be "false sense of security" and "minimal military, diplomatic, psychological value"


pg 53


	... Consistent with the principles outlined for atomic weapons by NSC-30 in 1948, Johnson and Chairman of the Joint Chiefs Omar Bradley argued that only a firm and verifiable agreement for international control could alleviate the military’s need to develop thermonuclear weapons. Lilienthal insisted on addressing the question primarily on moral grounds.115 The gulf between them was wide and neither was willing to compromise, resulting in an impasse.

	By the time Truman appointed the Special Committee both Lilienthal and Johnson had established firm positions. Acheson, on the other hand, was inclined to favor development, but had not made up his mind yet. In his own account he noted that in early discussions he never fully comprehended the logic of the moral argument against development, belying his initial thoughts on the matter. He also stated that both President Truman and he felt pressure to announce a decision due to strong press and Congressional interest, implying that those pressures had grown to have significant influence by the end of the process.116 Gordon Arneson, Special Assistant to the Undersecretary of State for Atomic Energy Affairs in 1949 and early 1950, noted that “[Acheson] was a realist. His experience on the Hill had taught him to give full weight to public opinion as reflected by the Congress. His sense of realism prompted him to conclude that...the Administration would run into a Congressional buzz saw and the proposal [to unilaterally foreswear thermonuclear development as an example to the USSR] would be stillborn.”117

	Bernstein made a persuasive argument that the Special Committee’s recommendation was predictable given its participants. Acheson was being blamed for the fall of China to the communists, which became official on 1 October 1949, and neither he nor Truman could afford the political battle that would inevitably come from intentionally weakening the Unites States’ strategic position by not pursuing the Super. Bernstein concluded Acheson approached the question honestly and did not just ritually go through the decision process “to reach a predetermined recommendation,” but that his “conclusion was predestined” by his own predilections and the political climate.118 Rhodes advanced a similar, if less developed, argument that “domestic politics strongly influenced Acheson’s recommendations,” based heavily on Arneson’s account.119


JSC went in debate between military need and moral opposition to bomb, with Achenson in the middle. Achenson was said to cave to "public opinion as reflected by the Congress" since he was a "realist." Bernstein said Achenson did not just ritually go through the deicision process "to reach a predetermined reccomendation," but was based on his predilections and political climate, including Achenson being blamed for fall of China to communists, and him and Truman not being able to afford "political battle" for "weakening the United States position"

pg 54

JCS responded to GAC with a report 13 Jan, aying no need for "crash course" but weapon had valid military reasons. Report was in "logical manner" addressing value of weapon. Said moral question "folly" since war is immoral, not weapons, and blame goes to whoever starts a war.

pg 55

JCS report wasn't supposed to reach WH but Johnson sent to Truman anyway, and Souers called Achenson to say Truman thought it "made a lot of sense."


	...Truman’s comment broke the impasse on the Special Committee and Lilienthal recognized he had lost the argument. Acheson, who had been shuttling back and forth between Johnson and Lilienthal in an effort to achieve consensus, directed R. Gordon Arneson, a member of his staff, to draft a paper that could serve as a draft report from the Special Committee. On 24 January he provided it to Johnson and Lilienthal for review in preparation for only the second full Special Committee meeting on 31 January.


after getting read on Truman's response, Lilienthal decided to stop debate and learn to lvoe the bomb


pg 56


	...On 20 January General Bradley and LeBaron appeared before the JCAE to testify. After they briefed the committee, McMahon concluded that the committee was in enough agreement to send a recommendation to the President immediately, but decided not to do so because of the repercussions of only speaking with one side in the debate. Instead, he scheduled a hearing with the AEC for 27 January. Lilienthal, withdrawing from daily responsibilities as he anticipated his delayed retirement, and knowing by then the almost certain outcome, deferred most of the hearing testimony to others. Pressure from aggressive questioning led Commissioners Henry Smyth and Sumner Pike to decline stating current positions on development, a significant change from their previous opposition. The JCAE had effectively eliminated opposition from the AEC as a factor in the debate and decided to meet on 30 January to draft a recommendation to the President.


JCAE and McMahon stiffle opposition to super and sent their report to Truman


	While it almost certainly occurred well after the decision to proceed, if any doubt remained the British government’s disclosure on 27 January that Klaus Fuchs admitted having served as a Soviet spy, for the past decade, much of that time inside the US nuclear weapons program, probably would have caused reconsideration. Instead, it simply served as more evidence for advocates of the Super that the USSR was aggressively pursuing its nuclear goals and very well could be further toward thermonuclear development than the United States. While it is beyond the scope of this paper, the Fuchs matter’s influence on the rapid evolution of the USprogram from feasibility study to production program would be interesting.



Fuchs revealed as spy a week later. Author thinks "if any doubt remained" on doing super would have caused reconsideration. Thinks influence of Fuchs matter on decision to make super worth looking at.


would the revelation of Soviet espionage before the super debate have changed it so that it woulnd't have happened? I guess in hindsight could say all they were doing with Manhattan project and super is giving both U.S and Russia the bomb. Not exactly helping national security.

Truman in meeting with Oppenheimer got pissed at him and said Russians will "never have the bomb!" A really different idea from what was really going on. After Soviet test in 1949 would imagine he reconsidered a lot. With argumetns for super, tehy were pushing toward idea that Soviets had aggresive nuclear program, but actually their nuclear program was the U.S. nuclear program.

So if the extent of soviet nuclear espionage were revealed earlier, very possible and likely the super wouldn't have been produced, debate would have changed.

Makes you wonder why Congress and others seemed rushed to get Truman to make a decision, and why the FBI is writing this.


pg 57

	As Hewlett and Duncan put it, by the NSC Special Committee’s meeting on 31 January 1950, “[t]houghtful deliberation in the blinding glare of public opinion was now out of the question.”126 The recommendation for the President was already settled. Acheson, Johnson and Lilienthal, along with a few others, met for an obligatory discussion of the draft paper Acheson had provided. After a concession to Johnson eliminating a clause advising the President not to move forward with production until feasibility was determined all three men signed the recommendation. Johnson suggested using a previously scheduled meeting with the President to immediately present it to him. They immediately walked to the White House and presented their findings orally to President Truman. Acheson, who wanted to give Lilienthal an opportunity to plead his case one more time, encouraged Lilienthal to speak, but Truman quickly cut him off with a question: “Can the Russians do it?” All three agreed that they could. “In that case,” Truman replied, “we have no choice. We’ll go ahead.”127 In less than ten minutes the recommendation was offered and an official decision was made, which was issued in a low key press release later that afternoon.


Johnson rushed Truman with decision to go forward with super. Lilienthal made his case one more time but apparently did a bad job. Truman decided to go ahead with the h-bomb.


pg 58

Truman made "vague" announcment committed to continuing h-bomb dev but not to a "crash course" or production. Author hints at difference between Truman press release and NY Times account, with NY times saying he was more committed. Truman agreed to facilities for production whithin 2 months later


	...It is important to note that the official histories of both the AEC and Joint Chiefs allude to the pressure President Truman felt to proceed with thermonuclear development during his meeting with the Special Committee. Condit argued Truman felt “the pressure of public discussion made it impossible to put off a decision while the matter was studied at length in the Executive Branch.”129 Hewlett and Duncan recounted Truman’s lament that he could not make “a quiet examination of the issues” because of Senator Johnson’s “unfortunate statement” and obliquely stated that “[n]ow there was so much excitement over the issue that he had no choice but to go ahead.”130 Both authors point to the lack of options President Truman had left when he finally announced a decision. 


historians point to public pressure and Johnsons statement influencing Truman's decision


pg 59

	Summary of the Participants' Positions

	The scientists’ involvement was quickly surpassed by others who had official roles in the decision, but they played a critical early role in informing potential sponsors and advocating for development. While it is hard to imagine today, independent scientists wielded tremendous influence despite, or perhaps because of, their lack of an official role. That influence arose from several sources. First, they had reputations derived from high level work on the Manhattan Project, arguably the most successful large scale scientific effort in history until at least the Apollo space program. Americans, including policy-makers, remained fascinated by the almost mystical power of nuclear weapons. Second, the scientists remained prominent in the still new and secretive world of nuclear weapons development and cultivated political contacts to aid their scientific work. Third, because they were outside the Washington political establishment it seems that some saw their opinions as apolitical and unbiased. Finally, what the scientists were advocating resonated with their audience. The political climate and world events made an aggressive response the preferred action, and the proposal to expand the effort on a new “super weapon” met that desire well.


Manhattan project scientists had "tremendous influence" then, because work on a-bomb impressive to public, political contacts, and perception of being apolitical.

author says the scientists (I think he means Alverez and Lawrence?) played a "critical early role" in advocating development of super since this resonated with their audience.


pg 60

author points to Soviet rhetoric of "violent conflict with capitalism" as influencing Truman's decisions

pg 61

also says leaks might have made him want to hurry decisions


	...The conclusion is clear. In late 1949 the history of the past five years led the great majority of professional observers and laymen to the conclusion that the Soviet Union and its communist ideology was a menace without equal that would never stop in its pursuit of dominating the West. Knowledgeable and influential policy makers like George Kennan and Winston Churchill persuasively articulated their reasons for that assessment and if proof was desired it was easy to find. The worsening situation in the eastern Mediterranean in late 1947, the Czechoslovakian coup in early 1948, the blockade of Berlin later in 1948 through mid-1949, the Alger Hiss espionage conviction in early 1949, the testing of an atomic weapon in late summer 1949, the communist victory in China and the discovery of Klaus Fuchs’ long spying on the USnuclear program, the latter two events both occurring during the US thermonuclear debate, are some of the most obvious examples. These events served as both real evidence of the Soviet Union’s expansionist predilections and as fodder that shaped public opinion and the political environment of the late 1940s. As a result, the climate in Washington and across the country was vehemently anti-communist. As Oppenheimer found out soon after these events, arguing against developing a weapon like the hydrogen bomb was extremely difficult to justify in the court of public opinion. 


public opinion was that soviets were aggresive against the U.S. and I guess saw h-bomb as way to defend themselves


pg 62-63

critical of Johnson and McMahon for trickery

cites Lilienthal's loss of assertiveness as another factor


pg 66

	...The note that the President found the military’s argument persuasive when the White House provided copies of the Joint Chiefs’ report to Acheson and Lilienthal suggests President Truman had already decided to proceed with thermonuclear development by 19 January 1950, then simply waited for the Special Committee to formally report its recommendation.


points out Truman probably made up his mind earlier citing response to preliminary JCS report johnson sent


	However, while it is impossible to determine precisely when the President lost the freedom to choose


what kind of crybaby shit is this? of course he had freedom to choose...


	...When the explosion occurred without a policy in place the only realistic options remaining for the President were slow or rapid development, and the GAC majority effectively eliminated the slow development option when its argument for unilateral renunciation became the de facto position of rapid development opponents.


says GAC opting for not developing super pushed Truman to decide between developing super or developing super faster



...


http://www.idsa-india.org/an-may9-1.html
	The "majority annex," whose signatories included Oppenheimer and Conant, advocated total renunciation of the weapon because "the extreme dangers to mankind" represented by it wholly outweighed any military advantages. Alarmed by the prospect of radioactive fallout, the signatories thought it was "in a totally different category from an atomic bomb" and "might become a weapon of genocide." Responding to the argument that the Russians may develop the bomb and use it against the United States, they reassuringly pointed out that the large stock of fission bombs in the American arsenal would be sufficient to deal with such a threat. The Super was, therefore, not necessary for deterrence or use in case deterrence failed. Renunciation of the Super would provide a "unique opportunity of providing by example some limitations on the totality of war and thus of limiting the fear and arousing the hopes of mankind."13


it was majority report that had line about "genocide"


	This was a remarkable document. Its signatories consciously repudiated the scientific-technological imperative that scientists had a duty to learn whatever could be investigated, and warned against the pursuit of a certain kind of knowledge. Having made significant contributions to the Manhattan Project, and having encouraged the building of a stockpile of a new generation of atomic weapons, they were now appalled by the destructive possibilities of a thermonuclear weapon. Their implicit argument was that the maximum explosive power of fission weapons could not be more than 500 kilotons. They had strategic and tactical value because their destructive effects were "geographically confined and ecologically absorbable in some set time period." Thermonuclear weapons, however, had no fixed outer boundary of destruction; they could become "weapons of genocide" and posed "a threat to the future of the human race which is intolerable."14

	The "minority annex," signed by Fermi and Rabi, offered a more sharply worded statement of moral objections. The fact that there were no limits to the destructiveness of the weapon made "its very existence and the knowledge of its construction a danger to humanity as a whole." It was "necessarily an evil thing in any light." Its use could not be justified "on any ethical ground which gives a human being a certain individuality and dignity even if he happens to be a resident of an enemy country." It would be "wrong on fundamental ethical principles" to initiate the development of such a weapon. The two scientists proposed that the nations of the world should be invited to take a "solemn pledge" not to develop such a weapon. The then available atmospheric and seismic detection capabilities would ensure that there would be no cheating. Moreover, the American stockpile of atomic weapons was adequate for military retaliation against any use of such a weapon.15 It was Rabi's firm recollection that he and Fermi intended "to couple American forbearance with a Soviet pledge to do the same."16


minority report not worded as well? (TODO: read)


	Both the majority and minority annexes expressed moral indignation about the implications of the new weapon and were also sensitive to the international ramifications of a decision to produce it. Fermi and Rabi had argued for "a provisional renunciation of the bomb, contingent on Soviet restraint." As the Soviet Union could not produce it without testing, and as the United States had successfully detected the first Soviet fission explosion, the Nobel laureates "considered their compromise to be safe." The majority had argued that unconditional renunciation was safe, while the minority favoured conditional renunciation.


majority report called for unconditional renunciation, majority for conditional on soviets


	...Acheson privately met Oppenheimer; he could not understand Oppenheimer's argument that an American decision not to produce the bomb would ensure a similar outcome in the Soviet Union. He asked in bewilderment: "How can you persuade a paranoid adversary to disarm 'by example'?"23 His sense of realism prompted him to conclude that even if the Soviet Union could be so persuaded, the Truman administration would "run into a Congressional buzz saw" and the proposal would be rejected.


funny


	...Bypassing the special committee, Johnson sent the recommendations of the joint chiefs directly to the President. By January 19, 1950, Truman had been persuaded that their position "made a lot of sense."27 He wanted to act before his hand was forced by public pressures. As reports of the secret debate had started appearing in the Press, he asked Acheson for an early report of the committee. And Acheson saw to it that a draft recommending a decision to go ahead with the bomb was ready. In a concession to Johnson, he deleted a paragraph reserving decision on development to a later consideration, and to mollify Lilienthal the report called for a broad assessment of American diplomatic and military objectives. It was "a masterful management of a process of recommendation that was not central to the president's decision'."


press and Acheson acted to hurry Truman's decision



...


http://www.atomicarchive.com/Docs/Hydrogen/GACReport.shtml
	MAJORITY ANNEX

	October 30, 1949

	We have been asked by the Commission whether or not they should immediately initiate an "all-out" effort to develop a weapon whose energy release is 100 to 1000 times greater and whose destructive power in terms of area of damage is 20 to 100 times greater than those of the present atomic bomb. We recommend strongly against such action.

	We base our recommendation on our belief that the extreme dangers to mankind inherent in the proposal wholly outweigh any military advantage that could come from this development. Let it be clearly realized that this is a super weapon; it is in a totally different category from an atomic bomb. The reason for developing such super bombs would be to have the capacity to devastate a vast area with a single bomb. Its use would involve a decision to slaughter a vast number of civilians. We are alarmed as to the possible global effects of the radioactivity generated by the explosion of a few super bombs of conceivable magnitude. If super bombs will work at all, there is no inherent limit in the destructive power that may be attained with them. Therefore, a super bomb might become a weapon of genocide.

	The existence of such a weapon in our armory would have far-reaching effects on world opinion; reasonable people the world over would realize that the existence of a weapon of this type whose power of destruction is essentially unlimited represents a threat to the future of the human race which is intolerable. Thus we believe that the psychological effect of the weapon in our hands would be adverse to out interest.

	We believe a super bomb should never be produced. Mankind would be far better off not to have a demonstration of the feasibility of such a weapon, until the present climate of world opinion changes.

	It is by no means certain that the weapon can be developed at all and by no means certain that the Russians will produce one within a decade. To the argument that the Russians may succeed in developing this weapon, we would reply that our undertaking it will not prove a deterrent to them. Should they use the weapon against us, reprisals by our large stock of atomic bombs would be comparably effective to the use of a super.

	In determining not to proceed to develop the super bomb, we see a unique opportunity of providing by example some limitations on the totality of war and thus of limiting the fear and arousing the hopes of mankind.

	James B. Conant
	Hartley Rowe
	Cyril Stanley Smith
	L. A. DuBridge
	Oliver E. Buckley
	J. R. Oppenheimer


majority report said H-bomb "a totally different category" from an atomic bomb, but near end says if Russians develop deterence with many a-bombs would be "comparably effective". Maybe could be worded better?

but they explain how its different I think--the area of effect is so large than any use of it would be wiping out many civilians. It's power would be unlimited.

The problem I guess is that you can figure using multiple a-bombs equivalanant to one h-bomb, so what's so bad about making h-bomb when already have a-bomb? And this problem is drawn out by majority report's wording. Might have affected Truman's thinking, reports he agreed with something like "can't see why one weapon less moral than another." (did he say something like that?)

I think what majority report was getting at is that it's immoral since the power would be unlimited, and any bomb with that much power would be so large that it's not good for much else besides wiping out whole countries. Any military use of h-bombs (and I think majority report was getting at this?) could be done with multiple a-bombs instead. Says the only reason to develop h-bomb to get ability to wipe out large area with single bomb.

Teller I guess came up with some counter-arguments to that like making a harbor with h-bombs.


also point out would reflect negative on world opinion for U.S. to build the bomb, something the soviets probably had in mind


	MINORITY ANNEX

	October 30, 1949
	AN OPINION ON THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE "SUPER"

	A decision on the proposal that an all-out effort be undertaken for the development of the "Super" cannot in our opinion be separated from consideration of broad national policy. A weapon like the "Super" is only an advantage when its energy release is from 100-1000 times greater than that of ordinary atomic bombs. The area of destruction therefore would run from 150 to approximately 1000 square miles or more.

	Necessarily such a weapon goes far beyond any military objective and enters the range of very great natural catastrophes. By its very nature it cannot be confined to a military objective but becomes a weapon which in practical effect is almost one of genocide.

	It is clear that the use of such a weapon cannot be justified on any ethical ground which gives a human being a certain individuality and dignity even if he happens to be a resident of an enemy country. It is evident to us that this would be the view of peoples in other countries. Its use would put the United States in a bad moral position relative to the peoples of the world.

	Any postwar situation resulting from such a weapon would leave unresolvable enmities for generations. A desirable peace cannot come from such an inhuman application of force. The postwar problems would dwarf the problems which confront us at present.

	The application of this weapon with the consequent great release of radioactivity would have results unforeseeable at present, but would certainly render large areas unfit for habitation for long periods of time.

	The fact that no limits exist to the destructiveness of this weapon makes its very existence and the knowledge of its construction a danger to humanity as a whole. It is necessarily an evil thing considered in any light.

	For these reasons we believe it important for the President of the United States to tell the American public, and the world, that we think it wrong on fundamental ethical principles to initiate a program of development of such a weapon. At the same time it would be appropriate to invite the nations of the world to join us in a solemn pledge not to proceed in the development or construction of weapons of this category. If such a pledge were accepted even without control machinery, it appears highly probable that an advanced stage of development leading to a test by another power could be detected by available physical means. Furthermore, we have our possession, in our stockpile of atomic bombs, the means for adequate "military" retaliation for the production or use of a "super."

	E. Fermi
	I. I. Rabi


why is it's advantage only when 100-1000 times greater than a-bombs? assert that without explaining, then say "therefore becomes weapon of almost genocide."


not worded that bad

has a good point about it's use would "leave unresolvabe enmities for generations" and "render large areas unfit for habitation for long periods of time", explains fallout better than majority report


"The fact that no limits exist to the destructiveness of this weapon makes its very existence and the knowledge of its construction a danger to humanity as a whole. It is necessarily an evil thing considered in any light."  this part probably didn't sit right with Truman. Report he agreed with said it's humanity, not weapons are the source of evil.  "evil in any light" assertion also contradicted with examples like Teller's nuke harbor idea. Broad assertions usually make for bad arguments.


last part calls for asking soviets to join in not producing, and implies can deter them from producing using a-bombs


minority report says similar things to majority report but more emphatic and weaker arguments. looks like effect would mostly be to undermine the majority report, basically make it easier for Truman to assign motives to them as idealistic/political/accusatory/crybaby scientists.


Fermi signed this then went back to working on hydrogen bomb



------


Parks report and other accounts make it sound like there was a pretty involved campaign for super, all to convince Truman to give the go ahead.

What was going on in his head?


https://www.quora.com/What-did-Harry-Truman-say-after-he-saw-the-horrific-consequences-of-Hiroshima-incident

Truman letter aug 9, 1945 to Senator Richard Russel

this was a letter stopping a program of dropping bombs on Japan as they became available.

Truman says Japan cruel and uncivilized in war but "I can't bring myself to believe that, because they are bests, we should ourselves set in the same manner."

	I certainly regret the necessity of wiping out whole populations because of the 'pigheadedness' of the leaders of a nation and, for your information, I am not going to do it unless it is absolutely necessary. It is in my opinion that after the Russians enter into war the Japanese will very shortly fold up.

	My objective is to save as many American lives as possible but I also have a humane feeling for the women and children in Japan.

	Sincerely yours,

	Harry S. Truman


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Richard_Russell_Jr.

sen Russell known for fillibustering and opposing civil rights, powerful senator

	During World War II, he was known for his uncompromising position towards Japan and its civilian casualties. He held that Japan should not be treated with more lenience than Germany, and that the United States should not encourage Japan to sue for peace.[4]


sounds like Truman was responding to arguments offered to him by Russell?


https://www.quora.com/What-did-Harry-Truman-say-after-he-saw-the-horrific-consequences-of-Hiroshima-incident
	Consider Truman's ambivalence to the reaction of Robert J. Oppenheimer to the atomic bombings.

	Oppenheimer repeatedly and very publicly expressed his remorse and regret for his part in the development of atomic weapons.

	In late 1945 Truman met with Oppenheimer to discuss the future of the Manhattan Project and controlling atomic weapons. The meeting did not go well.

	Oppenheimer confided to Truman "I feel we have blood on our hands." Truman was contemptuous, replying "Never mind. It'll all come out in the wash."[1] It was Truman's decision, not Oppenheimer's, that resulted in the atomic destruction of Hiroshima and Nagasaki.

	Truman later complained in 1946 to Secretary of State Dean Acheson about Oppenheimer, saying Oppenheimer was a

	    'cry-baby' scientist ... [who] came to my office ... and spent most of his time wringing his hands and telling me they had blood on them because of the discovery of atomic energy.

	[1] The meeting rankled Truman for years afterward and Truman recounted several different versions of it. In one version, Truman claimed he had offered Oppenheimer his handkerchief to wipe off the blood. 


sounds like Truman had some guilt

would have disliked Oppenheimer by time of GAC report


...


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Harry_S._Truman
	On December 6, 1950, Washington Post music critic Paul Hume wrote a critical review of a concert by the president's daughter Margaret Truman:

	    Miss Truman is a unique American phenomenon with a pleasant voice of little size and fair quality ... [she] cannot sing very well ... is flat a good deal of the time—more last night than at any time we have heard her in past years ... has not improved in the years we have heard her ... [and] still cannot sing with anything approaching professional finish.[214]

	Harry Truman wrote a scathing response:

	    I've just read your lousy review of Margaret's concert. I've come to the conclusion that you are an "eight ulcer man on four ulcer pay." It seems to me that you are a frustrated old man who wishes he could have been successful. When you write such poppy-cock as was in the back section of the paper you work for it shows conclusively that you're off the beam and at least four of your ulcers are at work. Some day I hope to meet you. When that happens you'll need a new nose, a lot of beefsteak for black eyes, and perhaps a supporter below! Pegler, a gutter snipe, is a gentleman alongside you. I hope you'll accept that statement as a worse insult than a reflection on your ancestry.[214]


overracts to criticism, same deal with reaction to Oppenheimer (in that case implied criticism)


https://www.nps.gov/articles/trumanatomicbomb.htm
	What Did Harry S Truman Have to Say About His Decision to Use the Atomic Bomb?

	At the time, the president seemed conflicted over his decision.  The day after the Hiroshima bomb was dropped, Truman received a telegram from Senator Richard B. Russell of Georgia, encouraging the president to use as many atomic bombs as possible on Japan, claiming the American people believed “that we should continue to strike the Japanese until they are brought groveling to their knees.”  Truman responded, “I know that Japan is a terribly cruel and uncivilized nation in warfare but I can't bring myself to believe that because they are beasts, we should ourselves act in that same manner.  For myself I certainly regret the necessity of wiping out whole populations because of the ‘pigheadedness’ of the leaders of a nation, and, for your information, I am not going to do it unless absolutely necessary.”

	On August 9, the day the Nagasaki bomb was dropped, Truman received a telegram from Samuel McCrea Cavert, a Protestant clergyman, who pleaded with the president to stop the bombing “before any further devastation by atomic bomb is visited upon her [Japan’s] people.”  Two days later, Truman replied, “The only language they seem to understand is the one we have been using to bombard them.  When you have to deal with a beast you have to treat him as a beast.”


Truman the kind of person who doesn't like trying to be convinced?

sort of like Trump


https://www.pbs.org/newshour/spc/character/essays/truman.html
	He had arrived first in Washington in the 1930s as a senator notable mainly for his background in the notorious Pendergast machine of Kansas City. He was of Scotch-Irish descent, and like many of Scotch-Irish descent--and I know something of this from my own background--he could be narrow, clannish, short-tempered, stubborn to a fault. But he could also be intensely loyal and courageous. And deeply patriotic. He was one of us, Americans said, just as they also said, "To err is Truman." ..... 




https://en.wikiquote.org/wiki/Harry_S._Truman#Quotes


comes of as manly no-nonsense type

was a war veteran


Truman's memiors:

https://archive.org/stream/memoirsbyharryst012833mbp/memoirsbyharryst012833mbp_djvu.txt
	America's security and the security of the free world 
	depend to a large degree on our leadership in the field 
	of nuclear energy. 

	We owe a great debt of gratitude to a small group of scientists who 
	have made tMs possible. The peace of the world, in a large measure, was 
	ia the hands of a few dedicated men, who in 1945 and 1946 ignored the 
	postwar stampede to private life, men who resisted or turned down 
	tempting offers from industry and universities and stayed on at Los 
	Alamos to continue research on atomic development. They knew that 
	atomic development had just begun, and they wanted to stay with it 
	because other nations would surely do what they could to overcome 
	our lead. 

	They were certain that unless we continued with research along many 
	lines that had been developed at Los Alamos and in other American 
	laboratories our position and our safety would be threatened.

	We were on the threshold of important discoveries, and I was anxious 
	for us to advance our work in nuclear development so that we might 
	produce whatever new weapons were needed to safeguard our military 
	position and thereby strengthen our hand in efforts to secure the peace. 
	I wanted to do everything possible to encourage those scientists to stay 
	with the government and to build our great laboratories laboratories 
	in which the thermonuclear knowledge was developed which was soon 
	to enable us to produce the super-bomb the H-bomb.  



isn't an accurate summary of the opinions of all the Manhattan project scientists, especially after Hiroshima and Nagasaki

I guess Truman admired the atomic scientists who kept working on atomic bombs after that



	...The AEC has broad powers and full control over its own operations. 
	It is responsible for the conduct of ail research, development, and 
	production in the field of atomic energy. Only the President, however, 
	can authorize the use of an atomic bomb. Only the President can 
	decide the nature of the weapons to be made. Only the President can de- 
	cide whether a weapon can be detonated for test purposes. Only the 
	President can approve where and when the weapons may be shipped or 
	stored. In fact, the President even sets the annual goal of the number 
	of bombs and the quantity of material to be produced. 


Truman doesn't like other people telling him what to do (reading into this too much?)

	...One of the positive effects of this development was to spur our 
	laboratories and our great scientists to make haste on hydrogen bomb 
	research. By the early fall of 1949, development of the "super" the 
	thermonuclear or hydrogen bomb had progressed to the point where 
	we were almost ready to put our theories into practice. I believed that 
	anything that would assure us the lead in the field of atomic energy 
	development for defense had to be tried out, but a most complicated 
	and baffling problem had arisen, and the alternatives were a long way 
	from clear-cut. 


Truman cites spurring H-bomb research as a "positive effect" of the Soviets first bomb

	
	...Everything pertaining to the hydrogen bomb was at this time still in 
	the realm of the uncertain. It was all theory and assumption. Even the 
	scientists and the Commission were divided. And, in addition, the ques- 
	tions with which we were concerned related not only to matters of 
	scientific knowledge but also to our defense strategy and our foreign 
	policy. All of these had to be weighed, 
	On the AEC, Chairman David Lilienthal, Sumner Pike, and Robert 
	Bacher favored a policy of going slow on the hydrogen bomb. Gordon 
	Dean and Lewis Strauss, however, saw no reason for any delay and 
	wanted to go ahead at once with a test program. 


I think Truman is referring to that report he got that summed up all the different positions?

"even the scientists and the Commission were divided"

Truman says he saw the decision as between fast or slow development


	The Commission gave me a full account of its differences of opinion, 
	and individual members expressed their own views in separate letters. 
	I once again sought the advice of the Special Committee of the National 
	Security Council, with Dean Acheson, Louis Johnson, and David 
	Lilienthal as members. 

	"I have recently received/* I wrote this committee on November 10> 
	"a report by the Chairman of the Atomic Energy Commission which 
	raises the question as to whether the United States should proceed with 
	the construction of 'super' atomic weapons. This question involves 
	consideration not only of the factors presented by the Atomic Energy 
	Commission in its report but also political and military factors of con- 
	cern to the Departments of State and Defense. 

	"To assist me in reaching a decision with respect to this vital ques- 
	tion, I am therefore designating the Secretary of State, the Secretary of 
	Defense and the Chairman of the Atomic Energy Commission as a 
	special committee of the National Security Council to advise me on this 
	problem. I suggest that each member of the committee provide from 
	his agency appropriate staff officers to prepare under your supervision 
	the necessary studies. I desire that the committee analyze all phases of 
	the question including particularly the technical, military and political 
	factors, and make recommendations as to whether and in what manner 
	the United States should undertake the development and possible pro- 
	duction of 'super' atomic weapons. Included in these recommendations, 
	I should like to have the advice of the Council as to whether and when 
	any publicity should be given this matter. ..." 

	On January 31, 1950, at twelve-thirty, the Special Committee came 
	to the White House with their report. It was a unanimous recommenda- 
	tion signed by all three members Dean Acheson, Louis Johnson, and 
	David Lilienthal,


this is interesting--it was only unanimous because Lilienthal changed his mind after hearing Truman's reaction to the preliminary report


	and the gist of their recommendation was this: that 
	I should direct the AEC to take whatever steps were necessary to 
	determine whether we could make and set off a hydrogen weapon. 
	Concurrently with this, the Special Committee recommended a re- 
	examination of our foreign policy and our strategic plans, both diplo- 
	matic and military. 


goes on to say U.S. should be in the lead on atomic weapons


	...It is to the scientists, the members of the Commission, and the dedi- 
	cated workers in laboratories and in factories to whom all credit must 
	go. The roster of the membership of the Atomic Energy Commission, 
	its staff and its advisory groups, reads like a list of the best men who 
	have been attracted to public service. Some of them were subjected to 
	harassment and abuse because they spoke their minds and refused to 
	play politics with the program, but these are the men who keep democ- 
	racy in the lead. 

	In this list of atomic developments, I have put the peaceful uses and 
	the military uses side by side. It is a matter of practical necessity in the 
	kind of world in which we live today that we gave priority to security, 
	but I have always had the profound hope that atomic energy would one 
	day soon serve its rightful purpose the benefit of all mankind. 

	I would have been more than happy if our plan for international con- 
	trol had been carried out and if all efforts of the world's scientists could 
	have been bent toward finding ways and means to make the atom serve 
	man's wants and needs. It will always remain my prayer that the world 
	will come to look upon the atom as a source of useful energy and a 
	source of important healing power, and that there will never again be 
	any need to invoke the terrible destructive powers that lie hidden in 
	the elements. 


he prays the world will use atomic energy for good, and it will never again be used as a weapon


------


NY times on H-bomb


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1949/09/25/93547700.html?pageNumber=139

sep 25, 1949

	CAPITAL VIEWS SOBERLY RUSSIA'S ATOMIC BOMB

	Plans That Have Been Made to Meet Such an Eventuality Are Carried Forward With Confidence

	HOPE FOR INTERNATIONAL PACT

	By ARTHUR KROCK


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1949/10/22/86787283.html?pageNumber=5


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1949/11/27/93332344.html?pageNumber=5

nov 26 1949

	LILIENTHAL CALLED 'ATOM PLOT' LEADER

	Johnson of Colorado Asserts He Heads 'Nefarious' Plan to Give Britain Secret

	WASHINGTON, Nov. 26 — Senator Edwin C. Johnson, Democrat, of Colorado, member of the Joint Congressional Committee on Atomic Energy, charged today the existence of "a nefarious plot, headed by David E. Lilienthal, to disclose to Great Britain vital and secret information regarding "the so-called super bomb." 


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1949/11/26/96479491.html?pageNumber=1

nov 26 1949

	TRUMAN DEMANDS LEAKS IN CONGRESS ON SECURITY HALT

	 Calls In McGrath, McMahon in Move to Safeguard Data Vital to National Defense

	 'SUPER-BOMB' TALK CITED

	 President Called Displeased by Senator Johnosn of Colorado, Who Told of Atomic Work

	By ANTHONY LEVIERO

	WASHINGTON, Nov. 25 — President Truman moved today to plug up national security leaks in Congress, apparently as a result of a statement by Senator Edwin C. Johnson. The Colorado Democrat said recently that considerable progress was being made on an atomic bomb 1,000 times deadlier than the one dropped on Nagasaki. 

	...Disclosures Irk Truman


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/01/09/87104483.html?pageNumber=21

jan 9 1950

	FATEFUL ISSUE RISES OVER HYDROGEN BOMB

	A tight little group of top Government Officials is maintaining rigid secrecy on a question that may be fateful for the whole human race. This is the question:

	Is the Atomic Energy Commission ready to tackle the costly job of producing a hydrogen super-bomb, a weapon thousands of times more destructive than the present type of atomic bomb?


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/01/17/86404567.html?pageNumber=1

jan 16

James Reston

	U.S. Hydrogen Bomb Delay Urged Pending Bid to Soviet

	Officials, Said to Include Lilienthal, Appeal to President to Seek Agreement and Thus Avert Making Weapon of Terrible Power

	WASHINGTON, Jan. 16—President Truman is being strongly urged by officials in his Administration to make another attempt to reach an atomic agreement with the Soviet Union before he decides whether to produce a hydrogen atomic bomb, and certainly before he actually goes ahead with the production of the "super-bomb."


says Lilienthal one of these

	
	...There is scarcely any aspect of this problem which is not controversial Some officials are revolted at the very idea of setting out to produce a weapon in which the possibilities for mass destruction of life are beyond human imagination.

	One of the most distinguised scientists connected with the production of the first bomb has written a detailed report opposing any decision to proceed with the hydrogen bomb. Other advisers to the President, hwoever, particularly some of those working on the problem at the Pentagon, argue that nobody who is charged with the defense of the country can assume responsibility for doing without a weapon on which potential enemies may be working.

	Those who take this point of view recall that the Administration's estimates of Soviet progress on the uranium-plutonium bomb were highly innacurate; that Soviet science, backed by captive German scientists, was well ahead of United States intelligence estimates.


funny

	...The most obvious military value of the much more powerful hydrogen bomb is that it does not require anything like the accuracy of delivery of a uranium-plutonium bomb. General Groves put the radius of "total destruction" of the Hiroshima bomb at two miles. But the Atomic Energy Commission scientists estimate from their present calculations that a hydrogen bomb would be destructive over an area of 50 square miles (and some of them put the range of destruction as high as 100 square miles).


why comparing miles and square miles?

odd argument, had bombing with decent precision in WWII (weren't they trying to bomb beer halls to get Hitler?)


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/01/18/89709292.html?pageNumber=30

jan 18 1950


mentions leak of sen johnson of colorado

says moral issues premature since we don't know if we can make it yet, maybe don't matter because "our hand could be forced" since someone else could make the bomb


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/01/19/102269350.html?pageNumber=12

jan 18


	ACHESON RESTATES U.S. ATOMIC POLICY

	Demand for International Rule Would Not Change, He Says, Even With Super Bomb

	By Clayton Knowles

	WASHINGTON, Jan. 18—Secretary of State Dean Acheson declared today there was nothing in prospect, not even the development of a super-bomb by the United States, that would lead this country to modify its demand for full international control of atomic energy. 


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/01/19/issue.html

jan 18

	Compton Suggests a Poll Of Public on Super-Bombs

	LOS ANGELES, Jan. 18 -- Advocating development of the hydrogen atomic bomb, Dr Arthur H. Compton, Nobel Prize physicist, today suggested a poll of public opinion on the issue as the basis for national policy.

	...Scientist were divided on the question, he said, and the decision should rest with the American people.

	..He said the use of the atomic bomb on Japan was supported about two-to-one by scientists who worked on it--a ration he believed was about the same among the public.


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/01/18/89708746.html?pageNumber=13

jan 18

	Much Hydrogen Bomb Data Known

	Information Has Been Published in Scientific Journals Here and Abroad Since 1935 and Therefore Is Available to Soviet

	By William L. Laurence

	While a curtain of official secrecy surrounds the hydrogen super atomic bomb, fundamental data published in scientific journals in this country, England and Germany as far back as 1935 show that such a bomb is definitely possible, and that Russia, as well as other countries, is therefore fully aware of its potentialities. 


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/01/20/89710317.html?pageNumber=20

jan 19


	TRUMAN DENIES PLAN FOR PARLEY ON BOMB

	WASHINGTON, Jan 19--President Truman declared today that he was not considering direct negotiations with Russia concerning the hydrogen atomic bomb and he declined to comment when asked if he was considering production of such a super-weapon.


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/01/20/89710373.html?pageNumber=24

jan 20 1950


	OUR ATOM POLICY

	Both President Truman and Secretary of State Acheson have rejected efforts to induce the United States to weaken its policy on control of the atomic bomb or any super-bomb that may be developed in the future. 


	...The only effectiv emethod they have found is that embodied in the United Nations plan, which has been endorsed by all Powers except Soviet Russia. To abandon that plan, and to make concession to Russia which would nullify its essential safeguards and permit the Soviets to manufacture atomic or hydrogen bombs behind the Iron Curtain while the rest of the world disarmed itself, would be to sacrifice the safety to a paper agreement which could only lull the world into a false sense of security.


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/01/23/89711287.html?pageNumber=3

jan 22 1950

"Hydrogen Bomb Decision is Demanded by Wherry"

reports Sen Wherry calls for decision on H-bomb before Congress is asked to decide upon aid to Korea or major defense and foreign policies.

Wherry says "everybody knows" we are main target for soviets, and suggests h-bomb best "protection for dollars we can afford to spend."



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/01/28/86408979.html?pageNumber=1

jan 27

	Decision on Hydrogen Bomb Rests With Him, Truman Says

	By William S. White

	WASHINGTON, Jan. 27—President Truman indicated at his press conference today that no decision had been reached on whether and when this country would proceed with construction of a so-called "super" hydrogen bomb.

	Nothing authoratative could yet be divulged on the subject, the President observed, and when any decision was made it would be made by him, and by no one else.

	This was his response when reporters recalled recent suggestions attributed to Bernard M. Baruch and others, that if the United States could make such a weapon it should do so at once.

	[In New York Prof. Harold C Urey Friday night became the first atomic scientist to speak out on the hydrogen bomb, saying that this nation had no choice but to go ahead with its development and perfection.]

	Mr. Truman added that he was unable to coment now as to whether he was likely to make another try at international control of atomic energy

	...Mr. Lilienthal told reporters there that stories and comments which "purported" to describe his views on production of a hydrogen bomb were all "inaccurate and some of them absurd."

	"What I am saying now," he continued, "is that I have not described my views to anyone."

	...Specifically he termed "absurd" a published report that he had volunteered to negotiate directly with the Kremlin toward atomic energy control.

	Mr. Lilienthal intends to leave his commision post on Feb. 15.


quote McMahon


	..."We have been discussing plans for advances in the technological improvement of atomic weapons. I anticipate your questions here by saying that this includes all types of atomic weapons."	


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/01/29/91100684.html?pageNumber=1

jan 28, 1950

	CONNALLY FAVORS HYDROGEN BOMBS TO PROTECT PEACE

	 Security Requires That Nation Have Best Possible Arms, Texas Senator Declares

	 TRUMAN STAND SEEN NEAR

	 Amvets Urge Him to Recognize 'Brutal Facts of Today' and Ignore Soviet Overtures

	By Walter H. Waggoner

	WASHINGTON, Jan. 28—Senator Tom Connally, Democrat, of Texas, urged the Government today to "arm itself with the hydrogen bomb" as an instrument of peace and security. 



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/01/28/86409271.html?pageNumber=6

jan 28 1950 

	BUILD NEW BOMB, DR. UREY DEMANDS

	Scientist Asserts We Will Lose the World to Russia if We Ignore Hydrogen Weapon

	FEARS WE ARE DEFAULTING

	By WILLIAM L. LAURENCE

	We Must Develop Super-Power First to Avoid Ultimata, Nobel Winner Declares

	Prof. Harold C. Urey of the University of Chicago, who won the Nobel Prize in chemistry for his discovery of heavy hydrogen, the basic substance that makes the hydrogen bomb possible, said last night that the United States had no choice but to develop and build the H-bomb as otherwise we would intentionally lose the world by default to Russia. 

	..."I am very unhappy to condlue," Professor Urey aid, "that the hydrogen bomb should be developed and built. I do not think we should intentionally lose the armaments race [with Russia]; to do this will be to lose our liberties, and, with Patrick Henry, I value my liberties more than my life

	"It is improtant that the spirit of independence and liberty should continue to exist in the world."


opposite day at NY times?

	...Dr. Urey referred to a published report that President Truman considered the problem of building the H-bomb in 1945 and that, on "the advice of two prominent scientists it was decided that no development of this weapon should be made."


goes on to say if Russians got it first they would reason they could do a communist world takeover




https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/01/31/98358915.html?pageNumber=12

jan 31, 1950

	AID TO U.N. UNITY SEEN IN U.S. HYDROGEN BOMB

	If the United States had the hydrogen bomb, there would be more cooperation in the United Nations, Gen. Pierr Billote, chief of the French delgation to the Military Staff Committee of the United Nations, asserted yesterday as he left for Paris.

	"When the United States was the only one to have the atom bomb and Russia did not have it, the copperation in the United States was much better"

	...Professor Urey, who won the Nobel Prize for chemistry ... said last week that this country had no chice other than to build the bomb, since otherwise this nation would lose the world by default to Russia.




https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/02/01/91628452.html?pageNumber=1

feb 1 1950


"TRUMAN ORDERD HYDROGEN BOMB BUILT FOR SECURITY PENDING AN ATOMIC PACT; CONGGRESS HAILS STEP; BOARD BEGINS JOB"

"HISTORIC DECISIONS"

"President Says he Must Defend Nation Against Possible Aggressor"

"SOVIET 'EXPLOSION' CITED"

	by ANTHONY LEVIERO

	President Truman announced today that he had ordered the Atomic Energy Commission to produce the hydrogen bomb.

	The Cheif Executive acted in his role of Commander in Chief of the Armed forces, ording an improved weapon for national security. Thus, from the domestic standpoint, he removed the question of producing the super-weapon as an issue that might be argued on moral grounds.

	As for international statecraft, Mr. Truman, by treating the hydrogen bomb as an addition to the American armory, also removed it as an issue that might be interpreted as an advanced threat or inducement in seeking international contrl of atomic weapons.


	...In his announcement, Mr. Truman regarded the hydrogen bomb as a progressive outgrowth of the United States production of the uranium-plutonium atomic bomb. He put it this way: the commision was "to continue its work on all forms of atomic weapons, including the so-called hydrogen or super-bomb."

	His use of the word "continue" was understood to imply that with national security the over-riding consideration, the chief factor guiding his decision was whether it was practicable to make the weapon. Scientists have said that it is.


	...McMahon, Democrat, of Connecticut, said that it had approved of Mr. Truman's decision.

	..Louis Johnson, Secretary of Defense, who had been in Mr. Truman's office today, would say no more than that "the President's statement speaks for itself."


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/02/01/91628727.html?pageNumber=28

feb 1 1950

	INEVITABLE DECISION

	We believe that most Americans will feel that President Truman had no real choice except to order the Atomic Energy Commission to proceed with the construction of "the so-called hydrogen or super-bomb." 

	...Meantime, our hope must be that the Russians will halt their opposition to the only plan for international control which has seemed practicable and genuinely effective to all other nations that have sought a solution of this difficult and vital problem. We must hope that the new and horrible possibilities of the H-bomb will bring the Russian leaders to their sense.


Don't they use the press to speak in code sometimes? even today, "Russians" usually means groups (like intelligence agencies of the countries they are in) that oppose them.

maybe that's a stretch

article is a little weird though


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/02/01/91628448.html?pageNumber=1

feb 1 1950

	IT'S A TRITON BOMB, MIGHTIEST POSSIBLE

	Would Release Energy More than Seven Times '45 Type



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1950/02/05/issue.html

feb 5 1950

William L Laurence


on a group of 12 scientists opposed to the bomb

	"is no longer a weapon of war but a means of exterimantion of whole populations."

	"its use," they said, "would be a betray of all standards of morality and of Christian civilization itself."


scientists ask to declare bomb won't be used unless others use it frst


	...But that is only part of the terrible story. What has not yet been mentioned in any of the public discussions of the subject is the tremendous fact, only too well known to the scientists, that the explosion of such a bomb would release such enourmous masses of lethal radiation as to make the affected area forbidden to the habitatino of human beings for possible centuries to come.

	...This offers a clue to what prompted the twelve noted physicists to speak out in anguish and with deep misgivings yesterday. Every one of them will no doubt be asked to serve in the development of the dueterium bomb, and possibly of its sixfold more powerful sister, the tritium bomb, which wuld use triple-weight hydrogen.

	Peril Termed Apalling

	"I am appaled," said Professor Allison, "to hear talk about the hydrogen bomb as just an improved piece of machinery. It is not just an improved atomic bomb but something of an entirely different order of magnitude. We can no more talk about the hydrogen bomb as an improved atomic bomb than we could talk of the atom bomb as an improved blockbuster"

	"After all, we are a Christian nation with a sense of morality. This is a moral issue, and we must resolve not to be the first to use it. Even though we may be criticized for tying our hands, we must still make this declaration."


author goes on to talk about which types of hydorgen work best for hydrogen bomb and science behind it


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1951/01/07/87093509.html?pageNumber=171

jan 7 1951

	The H-Bomb and the Clouded Future

	THE HELL BOMB. By William L. Laurence, 198 pp. New York: Alfred A. Knopf. $2.75.

	By WILLIAM A> HIGINBOTHAM

	FACED by a major international crisis, the United States is now mobilizing its resources. It is obvious that these resources are limited, even in this wealthy country, and that much depends on the wisdom with which this mobilization is planned. 

	..."The Hell Bomb" is about the super atomic bomb or the hydrogen bomb. The author, William L. Laurence, two-time Pulitzer Prize winner and science news reporter for THE NEW YORK TIMES, has done much to enlighten the public on scientific matters, especially in the field of atomic energy. The first reporter to visit the secret war-time atomic plants, the only reporter present when the first atomic bomb was exploded in New Mexico, Mr. Laurence is especially well fitted to write about the H-bomb. I regret to say that his book is not up to his usual high standards.


Laurence conclusions and "whole tome of the book" "stem from onse basic idea" that the h-bomb would give greatest advantage against Russia as tactical weapon against armies on the march.

Higinbotham says this isn't in agreement with scientists

	..."H-bombs, after all, are only 'useful' against the largest targets of which there are very few in Russia," said Hans Bethe, one of our top atomic authorities, in an article uring the United States to pledge itself not to be the first to use H-bombs (Mr. Laurence in "The Hell Bomb" brands this proposal, so well presented by Mr. Bethe, as quixotic and suicidal!)


	...It would be comforting, indeed if we could agree with Mr. Laurence and his conclusions in "The Hell Bomb." Yet we cannot take the book on faith, and it certainly does not prove its case. The outstanding authorities disagree with him. Their summaries of the problems and their opinions are not hidden in obscure technical journals but have been published in popular form

	...Faced by today's curtain of secrecy, it is not possible to draw conclusions with certainty--a situation which should be rectified. In the meantime, it is but prudent to take a more conservative and pessimistic point of view. Those who would understand these problems, thouse who would take a hand in determining their fate, will agree with Dr. J. Robert Oppenheimer:

	"The decision to seek or not to seek internation control of the A-bomb, the decision to try to make or not to make the H-bomb, are issues, rooted in complex technical matters, that neverthelss touch the very basis of our morality. There is grave danger for us in that these decisions have been taken on the basis of facts held secret. This is not because the men who must contribute to the decisions, or must make them, are lacking in wisdom: it is because wisdom itself connot flourish, nor even truth be determined, without the give and take of debate or criticism."

	"The relevant facts could be of little help to an enemy; yet they are indispensable for an understanding of questions of policy. If we are wholly guided by fear, we shall fail in this time of crisis. The answer to fear cannot always lie in the dissipation of the causes of fear; sometimes it lies in courage." 